2. Avoid the green egg yolk.
Needless to say, Rain or Shine’s advantage backfired to them. They used to live and die with their outside shots, now they’re just dead.
Let’s go to the Park!
9. we have discovered the brisbane dog park and it is just lovely. mr. darcy has a new best friend name ruckus who lives a couple doors down; ruckus is about the side of my stomach, but plays ball quite well.
Place all ingredients into your sauce pan over medium high heat stir then let them sit until simmering, your sauce should be thickened up by now. NOTE: I only made a small amount if you want to make more you can double, triple, etc. the recipe.
I decided to add shutters to lighten up and add interest to a few areas.
● put up a new building, or extend or alter an existing one (e.g. by converting a loft space into living space);
Bird cages nailed on a wall.
Yoghurt- 2 tbsp
Initially only one of the four was captured but due to the sterling work of members of the Lyttleton Police Department, the other three were eventually caught. The trail led them all the way back to Mamelodi where they caught the last member of the group at approximately 21:00 that night.
Sheriff attaches Mthethwa's furniture
that this wonderful blog has to offer
Kelsie’s 4th birthday – Care Bears. Last year her cake was a yellow Care Bear. This year…pink!
Now interviews are a strange thing. I've not done many and I have a pretty high strike rate of late (two for three if you're wondering) but they rarely worry me in the way that regular life does. I think its because I see job interviews as playing a part. I feel that you are acting the role of "the ideal candidate" so the person being judged is not you but the version of you that you're trying to present.
Alexander and his party reach the army encampment, where Alexander gloomily observes the rain has stopped. Francesco says armies can fight in the rain, and Alexander reminds him that cannon don’t light when it’s wet out. Francesco idiotically says they aren’t afraid of the cannon. Cesare tells him he should be. Seriously. Did he not hear about Juan’s disastrous battle? Francesco asks to confess to Alexander, who agrees. After the confession, Alexander asks him to promise to pledge all the spoils of this battle to the church. Francesco is reluctant to agree to that, but he has no choice. The church always comes out on top.
I’m glad that I just got the small size because this was super rich and creamy.
2 cups fresh pineapple juice
Cherie Priest's second long-form entry Clementine in The Clockwork Century world follows a side story from the Hugo nominated Boneshaker, which just happens to be one of my favorite reads from last year. Having read Boneshaker isn't necessary to enjoy Clementine, but it does add to some of the references made.
They are taking narcissism out of the DSM-5, as well as many other personality disorders. There seems to be a lot of controversy over this action and if you’re interested, you may read more of Stop Walking on Eggshells by clicking the link.
All images copyright Jacqueline Rush Lee.
doubting every step
The evil Darth Fermentor stands amid the broken and twisted bodies
In Sarawak, opposition parties have clearly articulated the basic structural changes necessary for a more efficient and just economy. Their policies have a strong emphasis on cleaning up land tenure and development practices. For example, in forestry, they have pledged to step up reforestation, reduce the size of logging concessions and encourage downstream timber processing whilst adopting tougher regulations on extraction that would make Sarawak’s timber more valued on the international market; all moves that would strengthen the sustainability of the sector in the long run. Whilst rather than focusing on vast oil palm estates on alienated land, they advocate granting indigenous communities titles and encouraging cultivation in small holdings and more favourable joint ventures. In addition, ensuring open tender processes for land development or public works contracts would raise more public revenue, allowing for greater investment in services, human capital and infrastructure, diversifying the economy away from its reliance on the primary sector”.
deeply corrupt and sinister here.
Dreaming of what would be possible. Of what could be achieved. If someone gave you a chance. If someone gave you an opportunity. If someone trusted you.
Timing seems of vital importance when it comes to these crazy ideas we find ourselves concocting. Something in our brains tells us that the idea is amazing and no thought actually goes in at all. In ‘Derek the Horny Diversity Dog’s’ defence, we did think a lot about our target audience and that students might enjoy something quirky and funny like this to show to their friends. But things seemed very different when the idea met stone faces during the pitch.
Remember how, last month, I went to an Empty Spools Seminar at Asilomar? In choosing fabrics to bring, I ran across a little roll of batik strips wrapped around what looked like more strips. So I threw it in my fabric box.
Conditions can make you shut
Such ecstasy, though maybe in vain
Michele Scott is the author of Murder Uncorked and the Wine Lover's Mystery Series as well as the Horse Lover's Mystery Series for Berkley Prime Crime (Penguin). Michele has been writing for more than fifteen years and after twelve years of pursuing her passion, she signed two three-book deals with Berkley in less than a year. Her debut novel Murder Uncorked, nominated for a best first mystery award by Romantic Times BookClub, hit the Barnes & Nobles mystery bestseller list and the Independent Mystery Bestseller list. Her newest books El Patrón and Happy Hour are departs from the cozy style. Happy Hour comes straight from the soul, touching on the struggles of women dealing with teenagers, aging parents, step-children, divorce and so much more. El Patron is a saga filled with lust, power, intrigue and action. Michele has been featured in The Writer, Romantic Times, San Diego Magazine, and Touring & Tasting.
Add splenda, peppermint extract, green food coloring and mix until smooth. Add chocolate chips and mix until combined.
As we were early, we watched from afar, invited guests streaming in (a mix of young and old) each and everyone were adorned in their fashionable and flashy colorful attires with glittering bling !
Okay Traci, I hear you. I may not like it, but I will learn to adapt. And with that hidden treasure to sustain me, I know I will get through this and get to the other side not only with a smile on my face, but with goals accomplished.
He was a professor’s assistant in the math department at the University. He brought me to his office one day and showed me that he had a giant photo of me on the wall- I was completely bald and wore a ring in my left nostril. I laughed and asked him where he found it, and he said he had seen it in a photography exhibit and had requested it from the photographer after the show. He explained that he had wanted to meet me for a long time before he had the nerve to talk to me.
The code in the Wilton windmill ‘sails’ looks a little like binary code but it reminds me more of either a computer disk image or, even older, the workings of a Swiss music box. I remember listening to a Victorian pianola in a resort hotel as a child. Its workings fascinated me. By inserting a large metal disk precision cut with a specific series of holes, slurs, slits and bumps, it operated like the miniature musical box but on ‘carnie’ carnival scale. The pianola took up a whole corner of the room. Like a jukebox it blared out its music hall rhythm the minute the ‘reading’ needle hit the disk. I seem to remember the music played a lot longer than current pop three-minute renditions… but memory sometimes tricks. The Wilton windmill formation looks a lot like a pianola disk, 300 feet across!
Enjoy the first look pictures below and psst… if you’re really good at catching details, you might just spot the name of Marshall and Lily’s baby boy. And yes, Barney’s back with the duck tie.
This is not something unimaginable. In Exodus, God chose Moses to reveal and deliver the massive system of the Law for and to Israel. The nation of the Jews failed under that system and God chose Paul to reveal and deliver the gospel of the grace of God to the world.
I'm terrified of this year's NaNo. I have been for some months. Last year went so perfectly and was so much fun that I know this year can't measure up. I'm terrified that the spontaneity NaNo requires will either elude me or cripple my particular project. I'm terrified that I'll start goofing off and playing videogames instead of writing. That I'll find I'm inadequate to the task this time around (particularly embarrassing given my oft-stated intent to break my last year's time of 8 days to 50k). I'm terrified that the struggle of pushing through writing that fast will make me hate it, hate the project, and hurt my love for writing. I'm terrified that competitiveness will get the better of me and I'll annoy all my friends.
So maybe the old pattern will not reveal itself again, or maybe it will. The only thing that I can do is keep trying and hoping that she will open up to me more than she has in the past. It took her 10 years to find peace in her fathers death, I hope that she will find peace a lot sooner this time.
I am a feminist. I expect equal pay. I should not be penalized for being a (future) mother, or looked at as less capable than my male counterpart. I am also very much a traditionalist when it comes to relationships and ascribe to gender norms–most of the time. I expect the man to open doors, walk on the outside, pay, and initiate romantic endeavors.
The buildings around Teardrop Park are mostly simple oblongs. No building is by itself shaped to embrace or partially encircle the park. The buildings, separately owned and by different designers, are clearly as distinct from each other as they are similar to and an obvious part of all the surrounding buildings that comprise the generally welcoming Battery Park City neighborhood in which it is embedded. Because all the buildings seemingly lay an equal and general claim on the space, they make it seem public. There is also something about the way they seem aggressively attacked by the musculature of the landscaping makes it seems as if they, like Mayan ruins in the jungle, can hardly hold their own against encroaching nature. One building’s backdoor entrance is blocked, almost impolitely, by a huge stone bolder in the middle of a path. Rather than the buildings claiming the landscaping the landscaping claims the buildings. In most cases it works. Still, looking smack into a operating health club through barely concealing bushes is an odd compromise. It all might not have worked; but in the case of the execution of the tour de force that is this particular park, it does.
The LINENS had no business living at the beaches of Florida, Sister Pam and Joe find they have much business there indeed!
As an Aries moon, I know about the intensity of the emotions that can come with an Aries temperament. Aries rage can eat a person alive. However, like any fire, it will burn itself out, if it is not fed. That is the important point, here. It must not be fed.
Has life always been like this? Has it always been the case that you simply can’t trust people? Do I dream of a Golden Age which has never truly existed and could never really exist?
Decorating the house has gone slowly, meaning we might not get the "tree" up. There's a wreath on the door, though, so the neighbors and delivery people have to assume we enjoy a skosh of festivity at this house. We do, really, but I'm finding it unimportant to get all tinselly indoors. That's what fireplaces are for (if it's not another Spare the Air day; we've had a rash of them in this sunny December). And I have a fantastic Christmas music channel on Pandora.
Oh sure, the developers knew they’d have to order all the kitchens and bathrooms at a silly price from a certain supplier in Miami and that a few “consulting companies” in New York and the Caymans would have to be paid to, well, “consult”. They knew that a certain politician’s nephew would have to be hired during the construction phase – but all this “juice” to the controlling political elites was factored in like any other cost of doing business.
As to the issues of consent, Respondent argued that Chet gave his implied consent when he incorporated the business; when he sold his stock in Respondent to set up an ESOP; and when he (as president and CEO) pledged Respondent's assets, including trademarks and tradenames, to finance expansion and acquisitions. The Board reviewed the various cases cited by Respondent, but concluded that Chet had given no such consent to registration.
As is the case in many Japanese movies, or series, the shows male lead, the shy Makoto Sugihara, played by Masataka Kubota, is ultimately terrified by Dogu-chan's sexuality. Ultimately preferring the company of fellow school-mate Kimika Shishido (Rina Kirishima), who is the exact opposite of the busty hero. Preferring brains to boobs, if you will.
Other important items for you and your horse(s) on a camping trip include a first aid kit, a sharp knife, sunscreen, insect repellant and coats and blankets.
Years pass by and she´s rarely seen anymore. The letters to her mother become random and confusing.
“And if the devil doesn’t like it, he can sit on a tack! OUCH!” They are nearly screaming the “OUCH!” for dramatic effect, some of them jumping for more emphasis. These kids, so much like the ones Jesus gathered around him. The ones Jesus tells us to be like.
Santorum completed his crackpot hat-trick by declaring his complete opposition to all forms of abortion even in the event of rape. He said the women should keep the foetus and raise it as it was a gift from God. You can’t make this stuff up.
A few odonata are finally beginning to emerge - Broad-bodied Chaser and Emerald Damselfly both made their first appearance yesterday.
"What brings you in today?" asked the triage nurse.
May God bless you today! And may He give you a renewed sense of His awesome power, love, grace, and mercy!
In a word that couldn't possibly sufficiently expresses my feelings towards returning to work, being back has been awful. There it is. I have been back to work for all of 4 days and I have never wanted to quit more. The thing is, I don't especially like my job in the first place. It pays well, it will look good on a resume, and I gained quality experience the first year I worked here full time (I worked summer and winter breaks as a student hire a year prior). However, I am no longer gaining any more experience or responsibilities than I did the previous 2 years, I'm not at all passionate for the work I do, and the workplace is full of drama.
OMA e-mail notification support
All the other sequels have been on this summer into holiday season. Harry Ford would just round out the holiday hohoHO! quite well.
Q: Evan and Jo, your female protagonists, both have gender neutral names. Why? You chose very romantic names for your male protagonists, and the couples have a rich romantic life yet your books are clearly suspense. How do you juggle both the romance and the suspense elements?
Some days the path seems shrouded in fog....and you feel the weightlessness as you stumble....
As the Doctor points out in his confrontation of Gavrok, the Bannermen are totally opposed to life, they only seek to destroy:
Kieran, my first born son flew out to Arizona by himself and will be there for 8 days. He has a wonderful opportunity to meet some family members and visit places like the Grand Canyon. I am happy for him!
Sam barely had time to doubt anything would seem strange after what they'd just been through when a low rumbling broke the stillness. She clutched onto her father as the ground stirred beneath her feet. Under the grass, long lines like roots stretched away from the tree trunk, moving, shifting and shaking the ground.
And if you need more words of encouragement to get started woodworking, I'll be glad to give you my Dad's number.
In JASMS (Jose Abad Santos Memorial School), I wanted to be cool, so for some time I made people call me J.C., but I got confused with a guy who was also named J.C., so I switched back to Jasmine.
After clearing about a cat worth of dust and stuff out of the case, husband pushed the button on top (sans the pretty button cover) and the ‘puter finally booted up. Have a feeling that I will just be restarting, and not shutting down for a while.
I got these at Super Wally World for $2.88. I would say the price for the product is not that great cuz I could have gotten more crackers OR more chips with $2.88 had I went for one or the other. I think a bag of potato chips were like $1.99 or $2.50?? That’s large bag too. The crackers I got last time from Pepperidge Farms also lasted longer and they were only $2.50, hence this was not a good deal, and I murdered the whole box in less than a day cuz it wasn’t much in there. So the price is a FAIL.
Are you out looking for the best buy HDTV? The truth is that, picking an HDTV is never as simple as it seems.
I am back to painting Peaceable Kingdom now after being distracted and chasing a March hare.
Mrs Angry - eternal optimist. x
Hank and Kellen had the time of their lives running through Times Square. Kellen felt like he was on top of the world on his shoulders and would squeal in delight...it was the sweetest thing ever. In an effort to fatten my baby boy, I constantly feed him Mc Donald's french fries. Don't judge me. After eating at a Brazilian restaurant, we stopped by the Golden Arch to get Kellen a large fry. I got sick of holding them up above Hank's head for him to grab, so I got lazy and just set a few of them in Hank's hair. I glanced over to see if anyone had seen me and realized we were standing in front of a restaurant where diners were facing us--two women spit out their food they were laughing so hard. I was humiliated. lol.
To launch the effort, Dr. Harvey will unveil an original painting of the endangered species, titled “Stirring Up Trouble”, for the event’s live auction. Proceeds benefit sawfish research conducted by George Burgess, who is widely known for his pioneering work as director of the Florida Program for Shark Research.
Let there be no mistake about the moral and spiritual background of the challenge being mounted by these Palestinians. Undertaking an open ended hunger strike is an inherently brave act that is fraught with risks and uncertainties, and is only undertaken as an expression of extreme frustration or acute deprivation. It is not an act undertaken lightly or as a stunt. For anyone who has attempted to express protest in this manner, and I have for short periods during my decade of opposition to the Vietnam War, it is both scary and physically taxing even for a day or so, but to maintain the discipline and strength of will to sustain such a strike for weeks at a time requires a rare combination of courage and resolve. Only specially dedicated individuals adopt and maintain such a tactic. For a hunger strike to be done on such a scale of collective action underscores the horrible ordeal of the Palestinians that has been all but erased from the political consciousness of the West in the hot aftermath of the Arab Spring, and may also point to a wider willingness of Palestinians to mount their own version of Tahrir Square.
I was flabbergasted when a supervisor at the electric company suggested I call a financial service center when I told him that I could not pay my $900 plus electric bill. So, there I was sitting at my kitchen table in my still morning garb and unbrushed teeth on a Monday before Wednesday calling the center because (and from what I was told by the operator the Friday before when I first called to inquire for help) the appointments were very limited to a first call, first answered basis, and the operator suggested it best I call early-as in fifteen minutes early prior to the phone lines opening up-and by chance my call had been answered, and I was set up for an appointment which is now today. I'm nervous, in part because I was informed by the operator that just because one garnishes an appointment for financial help, didn't necessarily guarantee financial help; so I had my fingers tightly crossed. And I prayed my caseworker would be compassionate to mine and Julian's situation.
Oh and guess what finally went to the upholsterers shop.? Yep the below two twin headboards that will be converted to a daybed with a trundle for the girls room. It really helps to have friends who have the same aesthetic that can send pictures via the cell phone to alert on good looking bargains around town. The headboards were acquired for $25 from a local consignment shop. Do you ever shop the consignment shops? Sometimes they can be cheaper than the thrift stores these days.
Try this. No idea if this is the way the Italians make it, but I had it tonight for dinner. It was great.
Today I consider a success. This morning I kept Gypsy on leash in the house and let her eat some of her bully stick. Then we went to our Growly dog class. We worked my modified BAT setups and she did great with the other dogs. She didn’t have any trouble at all. I didn’t let her stare like the other dogs were doing. Our version is more of a quick look and look back at me and sit. She was excited and happy and relaxed.
Cut to night bus back to Stokey and drunken argument with self over the nutritional merits of a KFC value meal. Is it or is it not a pre-bedtime protein snack?
and the sun just appearing at her elbow.
But it just doesn’t happen here. Not like that.
Patent licence
A mind-boggling suspense thriller with hints of mystery, comedy and romance all mixed in to give you one of the most exciting films featuring the Hollywood starlet Audrey Hepburn alongside old Hollywood’s leading man, Cary Grant. Charade takes unexpected turns and keeps your mind on its toes while you’re not able to turn your eyes away from the screen’s leading duo and the events that unfold during their unfortunate predicament and developing relationship.
You take her to a movie she likes (+4)
This recipe takes seven simple ingredients and takes no time at all to whip up a batch. I have saved my Vegenaise jars and use them for our homemade mayonnaise.
Blissfully unaware that their relationship isn't what it seems, the two go about their day as they usually would. Since no-one cares what Paolo does for a living (his best quality, besides being married to Diana, is his taste in alarm clocks), we follow Diana to work. While riding the trolley, she must contend with the raging trouser bulges of the two arguing Italian men that keep jabbing their clothed erections into her ass and thighs (the erratic movement of the trolley causes the passengers to become easily jostled). Tired of being repeatedly dry humped by this two-pronged schlong bombardment, Diana decides to stand somewhere else. Which, if you think about it, is futile, since sexual arousal seems to accompany Diana wherever she goes (a young priest is the next to feel his pants tighten around the crotch area).
"I gave him $20," she said.
There’s those that dazzle, thrill, excite,
A. He / She Despises Wisdom And Instruction 1:7
While the IGP says that no one was hurt by the police car incident, here is an evident that he was not telling the truth ..
Albero Motore was an Italian rock band from the mid 1970s who were influenced by the vibrant RPI scene all around, but never truly a prog band. The band from Rome had a short burst of success in 1974 after a great reception at festivals (the Festival of Avant-Garde in Naples in 1973, in Villa Borghese and Villa Pamphili in 1974) and went on to release their only album, aided by the musical everyman Ricky Gianco. Gianco's socially conscious lyrics were said to be quite good, covering everything from the Israeli/Palestinian conflict, the counterculture, imperialist domination of cultures, and globalism. A single would follow in
Venizelos sat throughout the meeting looking like a cornered boar. But once back on Greek soil, he made this quite extraordinary statement to the media there:
After making a round of research, the idea of staying back in KL is a better option as I still have my mum around. Now, that I got my decent living, I am happy and again, thank GOD for guiding me ahead.
Sweat onion, apple, curry and cayenne. Add squash , stock and water. Season with salt and pepper. Puree.
Airlines typically have sales in which they give double miles for travel on specific routes. But this fall, many airlines are also giving double elite qualifying miles (EQM) for travel to any destination. In contrast to double miles, bonus EQMs cannot be redeemed for travel and expire in the end of the year, but they can help you reach elite status faster. In most airlines, you need to earn 25,000 EQMs within a calendar year to reach the lowest elite tier, and more for higher ones. Elite membership not only gives your priority in boarding, seating, and standby, but also entitles you to bonus miles for travel. Most airlines give 25% bonus miles – which can be redeemed for travel – to members of their lowest elite tier and 100% or more to members of higher tiers on almost any flight. So think of qualifying for elite status this year through EQMs as an investment for earning more redeemable miles next year.
It’s limitless possibilities
Sadly, I was not flying Southwest this time... they didn't have good rates. That meant I had to fly a tiny little plane for the first flight and then a big plane for the second. If I was my dad, I'd be able to tell you the make and model of the planes, but I did not inherit the pilot-gene, like most of my family did. Suffice it to say that there was a little one that was loud and cramped and then a big one where I happened to score an unexpected empty seat next to me.
Here's what she did yesterday:
N is for Nuremberg (Bavaria, Germany)
But even if you’ve never blogged, you can understand the very different feelings evoked from a correction delivered with kindness and one delivered with an undertone of meanness (not to speak of overt meanness, which is not uncommon either, unfortunately). Lynn’s is a good story to keep in the back of your mind as you give feedback to your team members. It will remind you to deliver criticism in a way that doesn’t undermine their self-esteem or morale.
John Riley
Now that I’m back and jet lagged (who got up at 5 this morning? ugh) I’ll be getting back onto a non-training-every-day schedule (OR WILL I??) in which I try to get back to running and will begin with the bodyrock 30-day challenge that Michelle and I are planning to do. I’ll be doing that just as soon as I finish all of this unpacking and notes typing! So, hopefully today:)
3-The Badge
1 minuscule
“Touchstone: Where is the ID movement going in the next ten years? What new issues will it be exploring, and what new challenges will it be offering Darwinism?”
At a very young age we were encouraged to learn how to ride motorbikes, build tree-houses, drive an old beat up mini-moke around the property, water ski, play in the dirt and generally let our imaginations run wild. My brothers once built a homemade skate ramp out of old tin (yes, obligatory eye roll for the danger which lies ahead). It was an accident waiting to happen with its dodgy engineering and razor-sharp edges. I was the one who ran up it, slipped and put a rather large gash in my thigh. I still have the scar to prove it.
IV
On the first view to say, to swear, I love thee.
I’m always looking for new music, and I love finding great songs. To me a great song is one that takes me two weeks of constant playing before I get tired of hearing it. I used to buy a lot of dud LPs and CDs trying to find those great songs. Now the most efficient method is to listen to other people’s playlists. People love to play disc jockey and create public playlists, so it’s just a matter of finding people with similar tastes, or finding playlists that already have a few songs you love and a bunch of songs you’ve never heard.
On the surface, you can perhaps see why this is OP; taking away the most common form of spychecking is sure to lead to disasters of balance. Except… No. What many, many new players don’t understand is that everything you can hear, EVERYONE ELSE can hear. And from my playtime as a pyro, the ‘TSCCHHH’ of the icicle is very, very distinguishable. From there, the spy is airblasted into a corner for a few seconds until he can be ignited; if he is using DR, continue airblasting until it runs out – then finish with a flare or axtinguisher to the face. You could say ‘IN THE HEAT OF BATTLE, YOU WOULDN’T NOTICE!1′ or maybe ‘HOW CAN YOU HEAR THAT?! HAX!’ My advice is simple; from now on, treat spies in the same way that you would treat a dead ringer’d spy; the uncloaking sound of the DR is very distinctive (unless of course they’re using saharan spy), so just get used to that melting noise.
More than 3 MB please contact our management staff for further information. See below for contacts.
9. The MRC FINE Trial (sibling of the PACE Trial) failed spectacularly. It found that “pragmatic rehabilitation” (PR, based on CBT/GET) was minimally effective in reducing fatigue and improving sleep only whilst participants were engaged in the programme and that there was no statistically significant effect at follow-up. Furthermore, pragmatic rehabilitation had no statistically significant effect on physical functioning; equally, its effect on depression had diminished at follow-up. Moreover the other intervention being tested (“supportive listening” or SL) had no effect in reducing fatigue, improving physical functioning, sleep or depression.
I learned rather quickly that I was not the best person for the job. Unfortunately, I wasn’t ever really seen as an authority figure in the theatre department. As such, everything was more difficult for me to accomplish when dealing with the cast. (For those of you that don’t know, as stage manager, some of my duties included collecting production fees, making announcements to the cast, gathering bios for the program, and relaying information between the director, choreographer, and music director.)
Coach Packs
Of the 197 countries and territories assessed during 2011, including the new country of South Sudan, a total of 66 (33.5 percent) were rated Free, 72 (36.5 percent) were rated Partly Free, and 59 (30 percent) were rated Not Free.
The Holly Jolly is brought to you by the Halifax Library Association with
Round 13: (Knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together) repeat brackets across round. (20 stitches)
Little Weed!
Lily nods. “I’m not working tonight, so we planned to head back early anyway.”
It is this incestuous and deeply un-American collusion between the press and Mr. Obama that gave the president the astonishing bravado to come out the next day and joke about the incident by asking: “Are the mics on?”
Unleashing a brand new song, the 3 minute clip shows the Northern sludge pop band at their best. Noisy, visceral and direct, this previously un released track shows just how much force this band have. It sounds brutal and frightening, which is ultimately why I find it so enthralling. Without a doubt one of the most interesting and engaging bands in Newcastle right now.
- Hazelnuts spread 400 g 2 for $7.00 (Nutella)
One you have thoroughly weeded your vinyl, it's time to put transfer tape on top of it.
She ignored it and twisted out from under his arm. He snatched her back and held her snug and tight against the length of his body. She leaned into his soothing touch, savouring the comfort of his fingers as they caressed up and down her arm. Her body began to relax. “If I needed you, I’d have called you and asked—”
The Outside Dublin House Price index stood at 91.3 at the end of December 2010 with the average cost of a home being €174,570 (compared with €179,721 at the end of Q3, 2010). The last time it was at this level was in August, 2002.
Arguably, hemp is the most useful member of the entire plant kingdom. So how could nature’s premier converter of sunshine and water into value, a superstar of the biosphere and powerful supporter of life on Earth be considered an enemy?
So change your e-mail fonts. Don't print out unnecessary e-mails. Turn off your computer when you're done for the day. Buy products with less packaging and recycle the leftovers. Ride a bike. Buy local. Do the things you can that will make an impact without convincing yourself that doing so little will never add up to much. The world (and your wallet) will thank you.
I was 12 when I saw my first dead body with COD massive hemorrhage secondary to gunshot wound to the left carotid artery. Damn, that entire line with those big words sounds so intellectually intense, doesn’t it? Having lost a couple of close male relatives due to unexpectedly violent causes, I would say that staring at a dead body with a bullet hole beneath its left ear and a Y-shaped incision along its center is of no consequence to me. I don’t cry at funerals and I am not good at giving eulogies. However, the regrets that surface because of the suddenness of it all leave me awesomely dumbstruck. Words of affection you could’ve said, kind hugs you could’ve shared, and smiles of encouragement you could’ve given… they all sound so cliché and corny but, at the end of the day, these actually do matter, don’t they? You only realize it when someone’s unexpectedly dead. So what’s that realization for now? Years pass by and you have to think really, really hard just to remember what his voice sounded like… or maybe you got premature Alzheimer’s disease.
a blazing tyrant in the land of men
Joan Jett – Joan Larkin
Clinton arrived to deliver a call to arms for women around the world to get involved in effecting change. But not before expressing relief that there was one movie Streep had never made.
This is a drug I’ve never had before
Choked sob.
I can help you with your problems, pal.
And the understanding takes hold and I hear in my heart, feel it to the marrow and understand the cry of His will. Him wanting the cup to be removed, asking that it be passed from Him. "No. Lord. No.!" My lips mouth these words, but nothing comes out. "I don't want your cup, but I know that I need your cup. I need it if I am ever to become the woman I long to be. If I want to be your woman."
Scrubs
The eyes of a child are like windows to the holiness of God. Would we but put away all our preconceptions of holiness and find a very young child, even a babe and gaze upon its frail and untainted countenance; We would just begin to see the true beauty of holiness. And who of us who have held a little baby in our arms have not been moved with a desire to shield that beautiful innocence form the ugly ravages of sin?
May is the month for Newbie Bloggers! The Newbie Blogger Initiative (organised by Syp of Biobreak/Massively) will give new bloggers help and support to get started plus a shedload of publicity once you’ve established your site – there are over 70 well known and established blogs lining up to support this!
The solution to this problem is found in the gospel and for Tchividjian much of this gospel truth was found in the book of Colossians. It is here that Tchividjian discovered the gospel truth that Jesus + nothing else = everything because everything we have in Christ is all we need to shape and find our identity. The growing truth that is set forth in this book is that though we need to gospel to get saved we need it just as much after we are saved. The gospel not only “ignites the Christian life” but is also “the fuel that keeps it going (p. 37).” This is a book about helping us to find and remove the idols in our lives that our hearts seek to build our identity around.
To his way of thinking, it was the one true religion, the thing he'd been searching for all his life. Only in the presence of death could he feel the presence of something like God.
One item they found needed further explanation (and widespread derision). It was a foil-wrapped package, small, about the size of two flapjacks. The fact that it was actually two flapjacks was not enough for the security people: they had to ask me what it was. I said it was special brain food, my own recipe, a new variation on my world-famous Brain Cake (TM), called Brain Bars (TM). This is the literal truth but was not enough. They had to smell it. "Flapjacks," was the verdict. "With other stuff in. Bits, sort of."
Extras: Sizzix Swirl Die, Flower is recycled from a gift, rhinestones, ribbon from The Ribbon Girl, rhinestones,SU Tag Punches, MS Border Punch, SU
"You'll like him - he's got great hair."
So overall, it was a pleasant surprise. We got to meet the crowned Prince and the Deputy Ruler of Dubai, and took a gazillion photos with our Dean as he held his trophy, nice and proud.
Now if only one or more of these people could ever be bothered to be like, around, and not too busy or too whatever to actually meet with me and do something.. that would be really great.
But really, who is responsible for making these ludicrous announcements? There are clearly people on Planet Fashion with perfect pins and a heated taxi on call. Lucky them who can go bare legged, free from the worry of feeling cold when night falls or about the appearance of scars and varicose or spider veins, sneering at the rest of us who need a bit of nylon coverage in our chosen shades of faux pas tan when we don't feel like wearing opaque tights. Then suddenly one with an internship at Grazia notices Carla Bruni-Sarkozy wears flesh tone hosiery probably for all those reasons that the rest of us were already aware and viola! A trend is born.
I don't believe an aspiring author should write alone in a padded cell, devoid of all noise and the insight of others. If we did, we'd never get published, and I don't know about you, but that is my ultimate goal as a writer!
I was a tad busy this weekend- 3 birthday parties back to back for the twins to attend then Tyler was having his birthday party with his friends. He kept the cake identity well hidden until the day of the party and everyone was really excited to see the angry bird cake- it was lemon cake with lemon pudding/curd fillling inside.
Screen-shots showing the analysis of a precast pretensioned bridge girder with in-situ top slab are shown below. More details of the usage of the program, and the VBA coding will be provided in later posts.
The doctor also told us to feel free to start him on some cereal or fruits if we want. I think we may try some Oatmeal this weekend or maybe some Avocado in honor of Cinco De Mayo tomorrow, I think baby boy would like some guacamole!
- My wife says: I don’t like fighting, but I keep watching it anyway. Apart from when I’m falling asleep watching it.
Cardstock: Bazzill Basics Prismatics
“No,” he shakes his head to me, “we won’t start with her death. I will start with her life, before she married that man. We will start back when she was Marion Elmsworth.”
Once again I finished these by the skin of my teeth and for March we have THREE letters of the alphabet, eeek! I've started with all good intentions and I've already done my E tag but knowing me, F and G will be last minute again, lol!
Remember this progress would not have been achieved without the sacrifice, dedication and determination of the tens of thousands of members and supporters that constitute our movement. So on the eve of the Euro poll I wish to extend my sincerest thanks and remember that whatever happens tonight, I am eternally grateful to you all.
Anyway... to continue the invitation talk, my mom and I were discussing the invitations the other day and she wants to know how I'm thinking of wording it. Her only concern is that she wants her name down instead of just my fathers. They are married. She just doesnt want to be Mrs. John Doe.
Bonnie :)
This constant exaltation--from child childhood to adult childhood--has left many of us with out an internal praise-giving resource. This is an ego-deficit disorder. And is the reason behind our current mania for rating things with awards, stars, thumbs up and other sundry banalities.
Many sillinesses accompany superstitious fears of 13. For example, hotels and hospitals often have no room #13. Tall buildings often have no 13th floor. Room and floor numbers skip from 12 to 14. What should be obvious is that there is still a 13th room or floor; its label has just been incorrectly assigned as 14.
that long hair isn't great for someone on a budget for the cost of shampoo, conditioner, hot water, etc.
25-Chris Olsen
Around 5, we headed to the casino for some gambling action. Hubby headed to the video poker. I headed to the slots. The casino adds free plays to players cards and sends a mailer about the free plays every month, trying to entice card holders to come back to the casino. This month, I had $30 in free play on my card. Hubby had $5 on his. I think the amounts must have to do with how often you come and how much you play. Since I come at least once a year with my girlfriend, I play more money, but certainly not 6 times more than Hubby. So maybe it has to do with how long you have been coming.
That's right 700 posts. It seems like those 100 marks are coming faster these days. I've been posting a bit more for some reason. Game night was a blast. We killed a small army of wanna be fighters, scared the hell out of the help, I peed in a demon pool and ran away from the slimes that emerged. Fun times had by all.
3d) Impose 90 days of martial law. If you're in the city and out past sundown, you get arrested. If you resist, you get shot. That will hasten the evacuation a bit.
Sit down and mentally clear your mind and spirit. Place your hand in front of you and curl your fingers in, placing the knuckles of both hands against each other. Join your thumbs and have them pointing back at you. Extend your pinkies and have them pointing away from you. Now slowly chant the word “AUM” (as always see it as three syllables). This should help stimulate the energy of your sixth chakra.
Hans’ Pils
With each question they answered correctly, the more I found myself being seriously attracted to these men. I had to ask myself what is it about intelligent people that is so attractive? How was it these two men went from being older heavyset eccentric looking men to nice looking sexy men in a matter of 5 minutes?
Without a doubt it was a mad dash, so close to Christmas with no reservations made.
Recently I have been photographing several models who have been making a comeback into the modelling world. One of those girls is Krissi who used to model quite a lot but, following some time out, she was looking to get back into the swing of things and wanted new images for her new portfolio and I was happy to oblige her.
9. Nerves.
Later that night when Kuroda gets home he walks into a dark house but doesn’t think anything of it, with his back turned his daughter shows up behind him covered in blood and welcomes him home before walking away. Tragedy has hit close to home for Kuroda when the suicide investigations involve members of his own family, then Kuroda gets a phone call from the same young boy with the cough. The boy asks Kuroda “…if you die, will you lose your connection to yourself?…are you connected with yourself?” Then the voice of a very young girl speaks to Kuroda over the phone and asks him “why couldn’t you feel the pain for others as you would your own?” the child the tells him “you are the real criminal…you could only think of yourself. You are scum” Without saying a word, Kuroda realizes what the children mean. It took a tragedy within Kuroda’s own family to wake him up and realize that the real reason for the mass suicides happening all over Japan is because of people like him who are disconnected from themselves and their families. This is a scene where the movie really starts to come together and make a little more sense, it speaks to the heart of the lack of communication within Japanese society and more specifically to the lack of communication within families. But while all this is happening to Kuroda, the female hacker who calls herself The Bat has been kidnapped along with her sister by a group of young men claiming to be the masterminds behind the mass suicides. The leader of the group calls himself Genesis (Rolly) torments the two girls in his hideout which looks like some kind of abandoned bowling alley with small animals and even people tied up in white cloth sacks all over the floor. Genesis starts smashing the small animals to death with his boot and one of his followers brutally rapes and murders an unknown girl tied up in one of the sacks. But not long after their capture Genesis turns himself in to the police when his delusions of grandeur take over and he wants recognition for the mayhem he caused.
Beyond that, the gradual merging and redesign of my blogosphere to A Garden of Delights, and my sponsorship duties… I have no other writing related goals for the rest of the month. I can resume the rest in June, when I all I have to worry about will be sponsor duties and the JuNoWriMo (YES, there IS one…I’m am psyched!).
Holly on June 24 and Heather on August 13. It was truly the end of a long lifetime battle with disease. I hate Cystic Fibrosis. The disease makes mockery of those who have it. Although I can say, the girls had CF, but it didn’t have them. If you had asked anyone that I ever knew if they would have rather have been unborn, they would have told you “no”. As painful as life could have been for them, they would not have missed the experience of living for the world.
Please ensure that 1 hour before your appointment that you consume at least 2 glasses of water. You will need to have a Full Bladder.
"Did you get the woman's license plate number?" my mother asked.
Where we all belong
Our sponsor this week is the fabulous Simon Says Stamp. Play along with this week's Song and Dance challenge for a chance to win a $25 gift certificate to the Simon Says Stamp store - after checking out the other DT members' fabulous cards first, of course! :)
But so what? Love doesn't always work out. But I still have those sonnets--all of them--the ones I wrote the first guy, the MANY sonnets I wrote to the hubby. And, even better, I have the hubby. And it all started with that little Valentine's Day love sonnet, which he still keeps framed right next to his bed after 22 years.
statement.
So after calming both of the girls down and insisting they QUIT yelling at each other. I sat down with Katie and explained to her that even though she could sit in the back because Mr. AlJo said she could, it doesn't mean that she should. I reminded her that she will be a 5th grader next year and will want to have that privileged feeling of being able to sit back that with the 5th graders only, and that she wouldn't want some 1st grader back there because it was her turn be be that 5th grader who gets to sit in the back of the bus. She sadly agreed and also agreed to not sit in the back and that she would wait her turn.
* Image - KennyK 'Troublemaker'
I can't believe it's been almost a week since I have posted. My classes this term have been kicking my booty! It's been a bit of a challenge, but a good one!
Councilor Bill Foley then interrupted to say he wanted to be clear that I wanted them to go slow in taking over the libraries and I replied yes. Then Councilor Angelo Puppolo asked whether I thought an ultimate takeover was desirable and again I said yes. I pointed out that selling the Mason Square Library which was donated by the late Annie Curran was just one more example of the Springfield Library and Museum Association double-crossing their donors.
More Cumbrian dialect: many words seem onomatopoeic: "scrow", for example. The high incidence of words with that initial sound is apparently due to Norse influences. Thus "scop" - throw and "scree" - loose stones on a steep slope. And "scratting" and "scraffling", both of which I recall used in the context of struggling to make a living. Interesting how they evoke a whole way of life.
Lyon, France
Jeffrey said he had asked Mahathir why was it so difficult to disband the party in Sabah, and Mahathir told him he could not do so because of "maruah (pride)".
“Piss off.”
Copywork: The practice of seeing something on a page (or board) and copying that to paper trains the brain to hold larger and longer chunks in memory in the process. First it's one letter at a time. Then it's a word or two, then a phrase, and then a sentence. And guess what? *ding ding ding* This is the kind of skill that "writers" call on every time they sit down to write. Choose wisely when picking things out for your child to copy--good vocabulary words, solid sentences, quality poems and verses. Why? Because a child who copies good writing becomes a child who creates good writing.
Looking at the Northern Irish Citizens Advice Bureau website, I see “ceetizens advisement buroo”. Well, in the Good Friday Agreement Irish Gaelic is an official language, so “Lallans” had to be too. Ireland was colonised in the 17th century, by Scots in the North and English in the South- so Dublin is an English city, even if it calls itself Baile Átha Cliath. I wish the Unionist negotiators had chosen a different concession. I do not know how much dialect survives there, as opposed to different pronunciation of words because of accent, and while I would use the phrase “on the broo” to mean claiming Jobseeker’s allowance, I understand the word arose because men looking at the phrase “Employment Bureau” did not know how to pronounce it.
Since this is a Burton film, many of the visuals dazzle. That’s a claim you can’t really make of the original TV soap opera, which was constrained by low budgets and cardboard interior sets. The prologue of Burton’s film is breath-taking in terms of landscape, camera movement and special effects. I’ll go out on a limb and even state that the world of Dark Shadows – from the town of Collinsport to the Collinswood Estate – has never appeared in such epic or impressive terms. The sweeping, majestic prologue, which is Gothic Extreme (literally, with a double cliff diving stunt…), is very impressive.
All the key areas of children's publishing are covered: picture books, fiction, poetry, plays, non fiction, educational books, books for reluctant readers. There will also be useful advice for the newly published on publicity, setting up a website, tax and accounting, and handling school/library author visits.
Here is the motivation behind 5 Fat Files:
Saag Aloo *Indian Spinach and Potatoes* (Whole Foods Co-op flyer)
Brother Artemis
I tried to get artsy-fartsy and photograph this tree while on the
Then she falls into a gruesome nightmare, one that chills her to the bone. For the first time, Janie is more than a witness to someone else's twisted psyche. She is a participant....
Saurel-Cubizolles MJ. Daily commuting and preterm birth rate. Am J Obstet Gynecol 1992; 167: 571-572.
And only then, did I begin to prepare for my girl's day tomorrow. As Daddy and Jack were out at a boys' night at school, Phoebalina helped me hang the banner and streamers. She chose the colours to be hung, carefully holding the sticky tape and my legs as I stood on a chair ("Be careful, Mumma. I'll hold you, ok?") She stirred the cake batter with a very serious expression, and watched as I poured it into the tin.
Hopefully parents will realize it is about involvement – day in and day out. It is about being aware and it is about paying the ‘fees’ for their children to be educated. These horrible events happen everywhere – unfortunately they happen most when people are not watching and not aware.
While Jesus Christ was on earth, He was the perfect “Man after the heart of God”. Long before His incarnation, King David was called “a man after God’s heart”. Now, while we’re awaiting the return of the Lord Jesus, are there still amongst us people whose hearts resonate with the heart of God? And what does it mean to be heart-in-heart with God?
If Anthony Bourdain did a Brianna-themed episode, it would include the places below. These are the spots I dream about and always want to go to. All involve sentiment, good food, and a lot of fun. This is No Reservations.
1 worthy
The relationship between nature and freedom can never be questioned after experiencing the fly over the Grand Canyon. It was such a moving experience to embrace nature on the ground and then to transcend towards freedom. We are having such a spectacular time at this incredible place!
All the time they weren't sleeping, they were arguing, in an unknown language. I thought they looked prosperously central/south american, but the language, no. My best guess is Romanian, it was a latin-based language, but not italian, french, spanish or portuguese.
"Thank God it's Friday?" Did she really just say "Thank God it's Friday?" Does that mean that there's a discernible difference between this day and any other day in her life? That perhaps a Saturday spent with family or friends, or by herself, is an appealing alternative to working her shift at Starbucks?
If you're utterly desperate for mp3 fun while I'm gone - and in particular, festive orientated mp3 fun - well, you're spoilt for choice.
Please let me know what you would like to do...if you want weekly...we will do weekly!!
“The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, including debts incurred for payments of pensions and bounties for services in suppressing insurrection or rebellion,” the critical sentence says, “shall not be questioned.”
I AM Melchizedek
Mnet Korea will launch the new series on 7/19 at 6PM, and other countries will broadcast the show shortly after. Including, Thailand (TrueVision), Vietnam (YAN TV), and Cambodia (CTN). Meanwhile, tvN Asia and Channel V International will air the program in Hong Kong, Taiwan, Singapore, Australia, Myanmar and Malaysia.
Life is longing to be restored.
-Ken
The neighbor brought over his ribs tonight, they are soaking in the cooler with the rest of ours, and will be bbqed tomorrow night.
So here's the video.
Abraham moved in his obedience, but didn't know where he was going. His faith moved him to step out in total dependence on God. Every step, he required God's guidance to know if he was moving in the right direction. He wouldn't even know that he'd arrived until God revealed it to him. Chambers writes:
something to watch on a summer evening (I've been catching up): "brief encounter" - usually so not my thing, I don't do old-time movies (ie audrey hepburn phenomena is totally puzzling to me), but my god have I been sobbing throughout the last minutes of it. a classic. "last station" - mixed reviews, but I rather enjoyed it (although again, the ending had me in tears). I might be biased, since I love anything Russia-related and this one also has james mcavoy, who I believe to be extremely talented. helen mirren delivers a memorable performance - this is what I'm talking about, an actress who can move you with minimal effort, a hint of a smile, fleeting glimpse of emotion in her eyes. none of that over the top drama (I promised myself no pointing fingers here, but how anyone can think angelina is a good actress remains a mystery to me). "crazy heart" - there's just something about a good story and good acting. you don't need much more than that (but I'm also biased here beacuse of my girl crush on maggie gyllenhaal).
I wish you only to retrace
When I snapped this photograph in Paris it made me pause for reflection… The beauty of the cobblestones, the architectural details of the buildings, the faded shutters and the hanging lanterns caught my eye… I had to capture that moment. But more than that… It was the family, for I imagined that they were a family, walking in step, in simpatico… with their perfect strides. This image made me wish that time could and would stand still, that this beautiful family could forever walk together through the streets of life harmoniously, as they were on this particular day… My thoughts turned to my own family and myself and I realized there and then that my one true wish was for nothing to change. This moment in our time together is good… great even… may it
What have books done for you?
Went to something much more scary:
We are back with the 3rd Annual “Loki Sky and his NICU Friends’ Holiday Fund” benefiting families at the Alta Bates Summit Medical Center Neonatal Intensive Care Unit. We need your help now more than ever to help families, many of whom will spend their first Holiday Season with their new babies in the hospital.
23.Turkey 8
Well, the swap wrapped up. I still need to do the drawing for the prizes. I was very pleased with all the bags I saw. If anyone had a less than good experience, I would hope that you would email me in private with your concerns so that I can make some adjustments next time. All bags have been shipped. All but 1 were on time, which is a fantastic statistic. And, I did read all of your comments and suggestions on the last post. Seems many of you are eager to get going on another swap. We will have another....I just need a bit to catch my breath.
I like the position of the Word Wall now because all students can see it, which they couldn't before because of the glare on the whiteboards. Secondly, there is no glare now because the Word Wall is on the windows that caused it! I also like how each letter is separated, making words easy to find.
God knows they're a fucking charming bunch.
Aloha and Happy Earth Day Crafty Friends,
The strike took place this morning five miles from the town of Khashef in Yemen’s northern Jawf province, 87 miles east of the capital, Sanaa.
Hope for light in darkness, for relief in distress, for strength in weakness, for joy in sorrow, for deliverance when sinking beneath the wave, and for life in death. Hope for all you need, and for all God has promised. Hope thou in God, and in God alone. Hope because God has spoken, because He is true and faithful, and you cannot hope in vain. The foundation of your hope is laid in the blood of Jesus and the oath of God.
We are proud to have sponsor our Challenges:
Boy oh boy, this world is exhausting.
hoping to just get something part time
A question I pose is as writers should we do these assignments, do they help us?
Someone, yeah, yet another brave person hiding behind the Anonymous - let's say Anonymous # 526 has left a comment...
There's always "tomorrow".
The first hut we saw was Pinocchio, whose jerky movement made our friend's daughter burst into tears immediately. To be fair, kids will cry over anything, but she was not the only one. Other children around the park were similarly disturbed. In fact, we saw more frightened children in "Fairyland" than we did at the Dinosaurs Alive exhibit! The fairy in the scene was an old department store manequin dressed in a lace dress with shoulder pads and fairy wings made of stockings stretched over coathangers.
It looked as if everything was going to be all right after all. Sadly, at the final destination, I miscalculated the angle I needed to reverse into someone's drive and ended up getting stuck in the middle of their lawn. It took an hour to free the van from the quagmire I'd created and as we crept forward, it revealed a scene of desolation that reminded me of the Somme. I felt awful.
The King of Kong
Fairfax also said he was paid $10,000 in silver coins as a down payment for the murders, explaining that he gathered the coins from a desk drawer in Steele's garage, but McAllister implied that Fairfax actually stole it. Cyndi Steele had filed a theft report regarding $45,000 in silver from their home. Fairfax was listed as the suspect, but he denied taking the coins during his testimony. Under questioning from Assistant U.S. Attorney Traci Whelan, Fairfax said the theft report was not filed until after Steele was arrested. Fairfax also claimed that Steele had a list of about 12 others he wanted killed.
I say people of faith can be very dangerous bunch.
1) Fit: You want to make sure the shoe fits the shape and size of your foot. Sound simple? Luke mentions that most people have shoes that are too small and runners are some of the worse!
Blocking out the negative vibes to reach your goal is key in this Savage World; that you are no longer just living in, but beginning to own!
My aspirations to show them Christ appeared at the forefront of our meetings. My trusting heart has been to communicate where I stand which is at the feet of Jesus.
Hard candies/
but still, it's tough. it definitely wears on you.
I think that's all of the important details to share with you all! Will report back soon!
Schooled in the revolutionary teaching of the Black Panther Party for Self-Defense, all of us were committed to protesting an execution in the way deemed best for us as we saw it. Any action taken by us in protest would be justifiable self-defense. After all, the State of Texas would literally be trying to kill us! However, before any one of us received an execution date, another inmate would take the vanguard and protest his execution. He would be gassed. A team of guards would forcibly extract him from his cell. Beat him. Then take him to the death house in Huntsville, Texas. The name of the first was Desmond “Lil’ Dez” Jennings and he wouldn’t be the last. This happened in the mid-90s.
Other motifs are grids, stripes, and patterns, but not infinite patterns, these patterns don’t extend beyond the picture plane. They are contained within it. They are not perfectly tessellated to extend on open-endedly.
One last thing - this recipe does not necessarily make enough for a party. If you are serving it to a lot of people, double it (easily done). I purposely make this amount because I am an appetizer junkie and much like the Taco Dip, my daughter and I will immediately consume whatever I make almost as soon as it is ready, so this amount is simply a safety precaution.
1 in 20 young adults, ages 16 -24, don’t think they have to pay back credit card debt.
Stamps: Toad Sister (Eat Cake Graphics)
Artist Alex Green set off a media storm after his Placenta Bear went on display at the ‘Doing it for the Kids’ exhibition. He explained:
~lisa
It's the captured image of a star being formed from gas and dust --
On Thursday, I noticed a spider looking at me from the wall above my linen closet. When I came back to my apartment after being away for the weekend, it was still there, frozen in the same position. I figure when spiders go to die, the last place they would do it would be so visible as a white wall above a closet. Maybe it lapsed into a coma. Damned if I am going to touch it.
One more very big thing, for those not on face book, Zak had emergency surgery on Monday this week. He is recovering very well! He had an abscess that formed on his lower abdomen that grew very large in about 36 hours. We went to the emergency room Monday am and got some pain medicine, IV antibiotics along with Tylenol and Mortin to help his very high fever. He had surgery to get it drained Monday night. We got bumped due to other surgeries during the day, but finally got it done and were home about 10:30 Monday night. We can tell a big difference in him today. He is getting back to his old crazy self! Running around again and talking non stop! He hates to take his antibiotic. Other than that - we are on the road to recovery! Thank you all for your calls, texts and prayers! Hope did really well while we were away. She seemed to understand we were going to get him help. Zak was very sick and you could easily tell he needed to go, so Hope said okay when I explained it and did well playing with friends and with my parents for the day!
About a third of the way through class, I caught a glimpse of them both staring into space, with my iPhone drooping in Rosie's hand. I checked in and found out that the phone's battery had powered out. Oh well, kids! You'll have to entertain yourselves.
As I walk towards the trees I can feel tears welling in my soul and imagination, unable to break free or fall with any earthly purpose.
giving them away,
I remember when I was little, my grandmother was very superstitious. If a black cat crossed in front of our moving car, she would make an "X" in the air to "cross out the bad luck" I remember thinking it was funny. I also remember her being very real about it and not thinking it was funny. Some other things I remember is not opening an umbrella in the house and not walking under a ladder.
D) Must Embrace education”
Life in Malta was so different – good sleep, good food, good friends, time to wander the streets, sit and look at the view, walk on the sand, time for me, time for others and time for God. There was time for me to engage with my spirit, to start to learn to really listen to what is going on inside me, rather than just ignoring and hoping it was all ok. It helped me find rhythm in my life again.
"What?!" exclaimed Bluebelle, but Harriet just smiled and pulled out her wallet.
And on that note--
For a while, I waited, hoping he would come to his senses, hoping he would want to know his grandson, hoping he still loved me enough to forgo his bruised ego. And then, I got a voice mail from him. I could hear him talking with his friends. A baseball game. In a restaurant. He accidentally called me. I thought, maybe, this was my "in," this was my opportunity to get back into his good graces. I felt so rejected, so lost...really, what had I done to deserve such treatment? Followed my heart, my feelings, my passion for how my husband and I decided to care for our son? How could this be? So, I asked his wife if I should call him. She encourage me to do so. The next morning, however, he sent me a scathing email reiterating his previous desires to stay as far away from me and my family as possible. The emails continued back and forth for over a month. The hate. The hurt. So, I said what I needed to say about my truth, my experience, my reality...he continued to shame me for wanting to care for my child, continued to air his hostility and disagreement about my making the financial sacrifices to stay home. The final email was never read, I finally stopped the temptation I felt to sell more of my soul, my self-worth to prove anything more
The Paper Pretties Challenge Theme this week is :
Ever wondered what really lives among us? Getting coffee in line in front of you is a wizard disguised as a homeless man. The woman behind you on the sidewalk is a fairy masquerading as a stay-at-home mom.
~This is the longest amount of time I've ever stuck with any health plan, which goes to show the dedication and the change that has happened in my heart!
The tree was screaming.
Takano Kyohei, Oda Takenaga, Toyama, Yukinojo, and Morii Ranmaru are going to rent a house to go to school for free on the condition that they make the girl of the house a “lady”. However, Nakahara Sunako, the girl living there, is gloomy, weird, and horror movie maniac. She has a trauma of when she was told ugly by the boy whom she loved when she was in junior high school. She doesn’t like beautiful things and gets a nosebleed when she looks at something beautiful.
For a moment i dreamt of a reality where i was bohemian Isabel Lucas in Chanel surrounded by lovely wolves in the desert
He lived life at arms' length behind a brick wall of fear. Fear of success, fear of failure, fear of ridicule, fear of glory. This day he took arms against his troubles and rode the bullet train through the fear and reached toward the light. He would be free at last.
Reports are out that Coors Light has surpassed Miller Light to be the number 3 bestselling beer in the US, behind Bug Light & Budweiser. One of those stories can be found here. Coors latest marketing messaging sticks to one point, only that it should be VERY COLD. (I agree. Kills the taste.) What is funny is that Miller and Coors are supposed to be helping each other, being owned by the same company nowadays. Looks more like sibling rivalry. Clip of the info below:
come directly form the Galactics, in every language, over the Earth, to
Some of the life’s puzzling questions are answered by this concept.
by Pamela Spiro Wagner
As in home, to our house...
I know I don’t post as often as I used to. That’s because things are very much quieting down for me, and I feel like I’m in the home stretch. That light at the end of the tunnel isn’t a train – it’s the top of the cat perch that I’m inching my way towards.
Father God, thank you for the beauty of each and every person. Lord, I bind any twisted lustful desires in our youth and adults today. Lord, I ask by the power of your resurrection that the sin be destroyed so that our youth, and adults of today can experience sexual desires as you have created them to be. Lord, that they be an example of your image and not flesh. Lord, remove any demonic force or authority, from their mind, body, thoughts, and spirit. Father God, may they confess their sins, and broken soul ties and curses. God take control and authority over every demon that has inhabited their mind, will, and emotions, and body because of ungodly friendships they have engaged in. They are who you have given them authority to be. Say to yourself: I AM WHO GOD SAYS I AM
If you don't score one, or even if you do, you can get a rather fine poster of the jacket, with all the Stravaganzas on the other side from susannah.nuckey@bloomsbury.com
“It’s rental is almost his only income and all that is left to maintain the mere shadow of what was once almost a regal state when he led society and the sporting world and when Jerome Park course was named for him. Now he alternates between New York for enjoyment and London for economy, staying while there with his daughter, Lady Churchill.”
Er...that's great, Nancy, but who's your publisher? What's your book title? Why does your blog have only one post?
If there is a crisis, it is certainly one of our own making. Whether the question is funding, research, education or advocacy, the field is in desperate need of new perspectives and a new level of energy, both of which are available to us in the form of young professional staff.
which signals that all the juice has been locked
Christenberry’s focus on the habitats and hangouts of the poor, blacks
Who are John and Bill? Though they are models from a real life scenario I observed in the late 1980′s, on some days, they are both a significant, and often quite noticeable…part of me.
Students of Brooklyn history will recognize similar trends in Crown Heights--still a Jewish neighborhood and simultaneously a center of West Indian life in Brooklyn--and sure enough the Temple Issac (on Prospect across from the former Jewish Hospital of New York) is now the Faith Chapel Baptist Church. On the other side of the old hospital on St. Marks, I took these photos of six-pointed star grafitti along the shuttle tracks and an adjacent apartment. Whatever local gang or tagger painted them might well be a part of the historic trend Mashall talked about in Chicago, at least at some level, because the six-pointed star has since become a national symbol for the "Folks" family of gangs, whose most prominent associate gang is the Crips. However, gang-studies sites like the one linked above cite a more specific history, also based in Chicago: an early leader of the Gangster Disciples (a massive Chicago street gang that developed national connections), David Barksdale, was known as "King David," and his followers adopted the symbol to honor him after his death. The "C"s featured in and around the graffiti above suggest a potential Crips affiliation.
Back to limbo.
Five day conference registration fee for Wednesday to Sunday is: £55 (approx CZK 1696, €67, $86) and due by March 1, 2010.
Recently lamenting a lack of rock and roll in our nights out (and frankly our lack of nights out in general of late) my ex-housemate and I resolved to remedy this sad, sad situation. And so off we went to 'Ultimate Power' at Camden's Electric Ballroom - London's remedy for the power ballad deprived. Having booked our tickets horribly early - the event sells out swiftly - we then spent two whole months planning our outfits. Unlike many venues or events in London, Ultimate Power positively encourages the donning of ridiculous costumes; the bigger the inflatable instrument, the higher the hair, the blonder the mullet wig, the better! We stocked up on neon, faux leather and hair-spray. We donned leopard-print and leggings, and applied lashings of eye-liner. We were ready to rock. As were our fellow Ultimate Power goers. Rock band t-shirts abounded (although I wondered how many Rolling Stones songs many of those claiming allegiance to the band could actually name), rhinestones glittered, and ludicrously skin-tight clothing hugged the bodies of the crowd that filled the Electric Ballroom.
O Lord, I pray, send now prosperity.
The origin of many facets of the behavior of women in Thailand is the country's dominant religion, Buddhism. Many Buddhists believe that your present life is influenced by the amount of good deeds in a previous life and thus their next life will be influenced by how you behave in life today. It is a peaceful religion that discourages extremism. Thai women she trains to give a big emphasis on compromise and the right of all people to live their life as you see fit.
Since I won't ever play Eponine, watch this instead- my fave song.
FILL madeleine molds 3/4 full with batter. Do no smooth out
entries (based on owner preference) in the yachts they represent which can be offered available for purchase.
However, one of the most eye-opening experiences we had was nothing directly to do with the business community but, nevertheless, has the real potential to make an enormous difference to the development of an innovative economy.
Smoke 'em if you got 'em, then set your jaw and steel your stance, 'cause BEAT to a PULP: Round Two is here! It's all meat, no filler in this red-raw-and-oozing collection of twenty-nine tales of pure pulp action. You'll find aliens, gangsters, drifters, mountain men, private dicks, gun molls, loners, misfits, drunks, thugs, booze-hounds, and more, all brawling in the pages of Round Two. And that's just for starters.
Seems play time is over. Darryl jumps into action and charges with a flying kick against the second guard. When the guard defends himself, Darryl attacks with a flurry and kills him.
"..tsunami of changes taking place which could create a great deal of uncertainty and tension.."
SEE BELOW FOR UPCOMING EXCITING PERFORMANCES! We have some Sundays in September and October with performance spots for dancers, so if you'd like to perform at Shimmyshowcase, please check out the schedule below and contact us if you see an opening you'd like to fill!
Now boil 4-5 glass jars and their lids in a pan filled with water for about 10 minutes.
Blog/Shop/Biz Goals:
To touch you
Where: Lake Quinault, WA (home to the Roosevelt Elk!)
11. You My Flower
There are only two feelings: love and fear.
So, we will wait & see what the baby is in August when he or she is born.
Q: Will the new buildings and the arena bring in more traffic than the area can handle?
Depressed over the fact that he can't write a middle for what he likes to call his "colour crime movie," Steven passes the time by palling around with Kim (new wave music, taunting rivals, and Freezies), watching a guy count cars, riding his bike and looking at stuff (one of my personal faves - stuff rules), and attending dress up parties as a shirtless bank robber with explosives taped to his chest.
One of the biggest arguments I hear from people who do not believe in God is: “if God is real, why doesn’t he show himself once in a while so that people will believe.” Or, “Why doesn’t he ever come down here and help those of us who need it if he is real and supposed to be so good.”
We have a pigeon hanging out with us at the moment. He arrived about four days ago with a broken leg and a puncture wound in his chest. We found him on our front balcony so we left him some food and water. He's still here. I guess he is recovering and taking shelter from this continuous rain.
Nothing is real without its name.
¾ teaspoons baking soda
"I can’t believe I’m sitting at Six Flags and have to wait for hours to send this back to you. I just want to grab the thousands of people walking past and shove this computer in their hands and tell them to read this book. The end to this chapter gave me chills. I had a few nitpicky comments but this chapter rocks. Hurry and send more!"YAY! That's exactly what I want. And bear in mind, this isn't the climax. It isn't even one of the three "big" scenes. It's just the chapter I finished revising on Sunday, a chapter with three scenes that each resolve something while continuing to up the overall stakes of the novel.
· urgent Action Alerts notifying NVIC Team Members about breaking vaccine legislation news
students so academically capable.
including site observations, Officers concluded that major congestion occurs on the hill at this location, and in order to keep traffic moving through the borough considered that the provision of waiting restrictions would be appropriate given the obstructive parking which is taking place.
4. Shop your house.
Let’s start by walking down.
A little male birthday card for one of my favourite peeps... He is a little vintage and likes things dark so I went with a black card base and this fabbo vintage yet retro paper..
I'm looking for a student or recent graduate interested in textiles and the ins and outs of running a small business must be able to sew (using an industrial sewing machine) and great attention to details
Hi everyone! Every Saturday I volunteer at Almost Home Foundation, which is an animal rescue organization that springs about-to-be-euthanized dogs from high kill shelters, puts them in temporary foster homes, and matches them with permanent families. On Saturdays, the dogs are brought to Petsmart stores so that people can meet them in person. My volunteer job is to "handle" one of the dogs, introduce him to people, tell them background information on the dog, and hopefully find him a home! Generally I have a different dog each week. I thought that I would start a new feature on this blog, where I will tell yot u about one of the dogs I met who needs a home. Maybe this way I can help a few dogs and families come together!
"We are just about to move into a new business unit, close to the city centre of Birmingham. This should give us a little more space and focus, which we hope will help us develop our brand. We try to offer excellent customer service, as well as little personal touches for our customers.
How was the sauce? Pretty good. It wasn't as yellow as I thought it would be (so no jokes about, "Please don't eat the yellow sauce," which I was so looking forward to doing). The saffron and pancetta gave it just the right twist on flavor so it didn't taste like every other chicken dish I make. Would definitely try this one again.
"FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE! FAKE!"
That’s unsustainable.
Who am I when I'm not with the Archduchess? I'm Sarah. Plain Sarah, who learns to live in a world that's not quite perfect, with all the Good Things and Bad Things that happen, who learns to like who she is, who finds her passions in life. From biology, I discovered marine biology. From marine biology, I discovered invertebrates. I discovered coral reefs. I discovered I could go anywhere in the world.
You probably have a list of things you wish you could change about your appearance. You may not even like the way you look and mirrors may be something you avoid like the bubonic plague.
Learn about anxiety, CBT and the benefits of NOT taking anti-anxiety medications long-term here:
The loops are great and riders are under significant positive Gs during them. I didn't ride it at night this time, but after dark it's lit up with lights all along the sides of the track which is particularly cool as you go through the loops. They're fun, but I like the drops. Airtime is best.
We’ve built a house, and it’s become a home. Guildmates become friends who, in turn, have become extended family.
Apple launched its latest iPad in countries like South Korea, Brunei, Croatia, Cyprus, Dominican Republic,El Salvador,Guatemala,Malaysia,Panama , St Maarten, Uruguay and Venezuela. InIndia it will come after a month. Its thought that this device bridge the gap between smart phone & desktop, this the main reason behind its delayed release inIndia.
Marley looked away, suddenly the pizza cloyed at his stomach and the lure of money dissipated in his conscience. Coming here had been a bad idea. A stupid idea. In one simple observation Piper had shown how ill fit Marley was for this business. How ill fit Marley was for Washington Heights. What was Piper playing at? Why bring him here to postulate his weaknesses?
A gardener who chopped off his arm in a freak chainsaw accident calmly knocked on his neighbor front door and told him: 'Please help, I've cut my arm off.'
The thank you was stamped then punched out with word window punch then wrapped with linen thread to add some interest then glued down then snipped off to line it up.
from T. S. Eliot, ‘The Waste Land’
So, the menu is the next big challenge but before we start composing that there is the ‘theme’ that we need to come up with and with Mother’s Day around the corner that seems to guide us.
In a rather odd game in the Bernabeu, Bayern Munich levelled the tie and then held their nerve in the penalty shoot-out to take their place in a home final vs Chelsea. Real Madrid took an early lead with two quick-fire goals from Cristiano Ronaldo, but Pepe’s push on Mario Gomez allowed Arjen Robben to square the aggregate score from the spot, just before half-time. A further half and extra-time passed, before Bayern, as a typical German team do, won the shoot-out.
Wendy also struck again with her scores for Clockwork Orange and then Tron (not that that was such a good movie). This kept her in front of another generation or three. Interestingly most of her personal music is a bit hard to take for most ears so it is really from these three recordings that she changed modern music.
Keep your eyes on the ball… the fairway to empowering your Junior is clear ahead!
We usually prefer to go somewhere in between knee-length and capris.
She recently worked on some gorgeous belly bands to go on menus that I designed. Talk about talent!
The GM rolls 1d12 on the Quickie Dice Map; this is the month in which something unusual happened. The base roll is neither good nor bad, just something different than the norm; depending on what happens, however, players may have to adjust future actions to match events. In addition, if the "reaction" of the locale is Low or High, the GM should roll an extra d12 of a different color, which specifically represents potential setbacks or miracles; if the reaction was Very Low/Very High, the GM rolls 2d12 for setbacks or miracles. The GM will never roll for both setbacks and miracles, though; whether things go wrong or go well basically depends on "the judgments of the gods".
If you really hate the cover, you need to be able to say exactly what you hate about it and you need to listen to the reasons the publisher gives for choosing it. You might just be wrong. Or they might be wrong. Unfortunately, they have the final say, wrong or not. As always, a strong argument is more likely to get a result than tears and tantrums. Stroppy does not always mean having a strop. And if you're going to be stroppy, you also have to be right.
The question now is how much longer the emergency services will be there to answer the doorbell which, it is safe to say, will no doubt be revamped when the brigade moves on to new quarters!
Another two months passed before I decided to toot my own horn once again, and so I shared my joy at reaching 1500 views – a once-unforeseen goal, and thus a greatly appreciated achievement.
Why so scared that you’ll mess it up, when perfection keeps you haunted?
Supreme Allied Commander, Atlantic/Commander in Chief, U.S. Joint Forces Command (‘00-‘02)
You will have until next Thursday (March 29) morning 6:00 AM EST to link your project.
Helma Sawatzky, Simon Fraser University. Anemone Theory: An Exploration of Digital Media as Phenomena
~If you leave the noodles out and lessen the broth, this would make wonderful pot pie filling.
Mr Dale, originally called Ken, lived and worked in Dumfries, south-west Scotland, in the 1990s.
Didn't we have a lovely time
Add the potatoes to the pan and all but a few shreds of leek. Pour in the remaining stock and season well. Bring to the boil, cover and simmer for 25 minutes until tender.
as do the memories of my trip,
I've been devoting my time to the deadlines I had already
Speaking at the provincial legislature debate on conservation and the environment, Keys said that by allowing the slaughter to continue, the department is threatening jobs in the tourism industry and KZN’s reputation as a world-class destination for tourists.
Now Ali returns to original form with "In the Kitchen," her meditation on the goings-on at the fictional Imperial Hotel in London's Piccadilly. Her pet themes - migration, multiculturalism, racism, settling in - are in full display, and the prose crackles with verve and vivacity.
Unless the apologist creates internal silence in his reader, unless he produces somehow that precious moment of sudden, standstill shock, his apologetics is only chatter or scholarship, not power . . .
The 3 ounce cookie is big enough to share but I'm sure making these in a smaller size would work also. And with the extra egg yolks in the batter, my cookies came out with a nice golden color. Because I buy my eggs from a local egg farm, the yolks have a deeper orange color than supermarket eggs.
I thought it was well-written.
The day of the party arrived. A ice and snow storm had hit the area of my Uncle and one of my brothers and they were not able to make it. Bummer.
Is it poor form just to link to our online listing in my "home tour" tab? :)
trying to bite off the iv in her arm.
We both to my safe house. Viz. bawdy house. Greeted by the new girl Molly. Having been fully involved in her education, and my amorous propensities being once more in need of an outlet, felt compelled to increase her level of knowledge still further. Therefore taught her to perform the almost unknown of ‘Magna Veneris Amor Lapsu’. Viz. ‘The Great Venusian Love Slip’. This particular feat I discovered in my, the only known copy of ‘Sacra Sexus Cum Veneris’. An ancient, enlightening and fully illustrated and annotated tome rediscovered at the fall of Constantinople in 1453. NOTE: The original is now sadly lost. NOTE: Molly’s ability to learn, and her readiness to perform, never ceases to render me into a welcome state of both admiration and rapture.
She's getting ready to do yoga with mommy:)
If this illegal scum wins his case, can you just imagine the consequences it would have on the legal system and the floodgates of illegals thinking they can sue to work here, get free aid and do what they please, all while breaking the law. This piece of Mexican trash is going to do one thing and one thing only if he wins, and that is fight and tie up the legal systems with frivolous lawsuits for illegal immigrants. I would say that any other state would look at his claim and laugh it off and tell him to leave. Oh contraire, where I live (The good ol’ safe haven for illegal aliens, California) the idiots in our Supreme Court would not only consider it, but also take him to lunch, wine and dine and find out what more he desires. Then Tony Villar (that is the male form of the name of LA Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa) would take him on the Long Beach Yacht that is wasting tax payers dollars (yes it is a yacht you illiterate dumbo-eared poor excuse for a mayor), and offer him a key to the city along with all of the free perks he desires. So Florida and California in this writers opinions are the worse places to be an American citizen, because here, the illegal pieces of trash from Mexico and any other degenerated country have more rights in these two states then naturally born citizens.
And no wonder. If anyone knows what cute is, it’s the Japanese.
Oslo, Norway
tanguera: "do you know all this music inside-out?"
They used the original Japanese poster art, modified by adding a modern English language logo for the front cover. The only thing that confuses me is the twin ‘ray-guns’ that are used in the logo. They don’t resemble anything used in the film. The front of the ‘gun’ looks a little like a space capsule. This shape is the cursor used on the menus, as well. The back cover’s images consist purely of what look like screen captures, though they are very clear. The disc itself is nicely done as well.
If you saw my pictures on the 14th, you noticed that I attended the Big Texas Beer Festival. Overall, I had a great time. There was a exceptional selection of craft beer. I noticed the shortest lines at Blue Moon and Shock Top, which I would have expected. It was gratifying to see that the lines at the Texas Beer booths seemed to be the longest.
man that was known for performing miracles. Well one day he went to see him for his own miracle. Which was the healing of leprosy. So he went thinking he would have Elisha wave his had over him and that would be it..(wrong) The prophet told him to dunk himself 7 times… He did and experienced a miracle. Now here’s where it gets interesting, Naaman wanted to give,bless the man of God..in verse 15 . Which it was refused BUT the man of God’s servant was there watching all this take place.
They regard themselves as a cool, young sub-set of the Goths.
We cannot go for miles
(If you’d like to email me something, send it to victoria.parkey@gmail.com)
Los Blancos hold a seven-point lead over second-placed Barcelona with only two more league games to be played.
p.s. If you’re a Whovian, this might weird you out a bit.
4 nights a week $350.00 (for 2 months)
It is not by circumstance that the district is suffering financial woe. It is the lack of accountability and due diligence by this community that causes us to pay dearly for our children’s failure.
Because we owe OURSELVES... A Little Respect...
By contrast, I was sorry to come to the end of Susan Mallery’s winning Barefoot Season (Mira, digital galley via NetGalley), which is a lot more than the beach book its cover indicates. Michelle Sanderson and Carly Williams were best friends growing up until Michelle’s betrayal severed their bond. Now, 10 years later, Michelle, an Army vet with a bum hip and PTSD, returns to her family’s small inn on Puget Sound after the death of her difficult mother. She finds the business struggling against heavy debt and is quick to blame single mom Carly, who has been managing the inn in hopes of becoming part-owner. Forced to work together by a loan officer with her own agenda, Michelle and Carly have to confront the past and weather the present if either is going to have a future on Blackberry Island.
Ironically, Jessica Gottlieb, author of the original tweet, said that she felt the ad did not need to be pulled. What if Motrin had originally addressed her directly and enlisted her help?
However... I was still willing to try the same thing again rather than do nothing. In my horrible state of emotionality trumps all, I was letting my fears get to me. "I don't ovulate at all on my own. I'm going to be in limbo for years until I ovulate next if we don't do something. I don't want to wait years..." So I called Dan and told him that I wasn't pregnant and that I was going to call Doc and see if we could do another round.
I’ve introduced daily fruit for the first time in several months. Also, having bread again on a weekday feels weird. But I need a shake up and I’m hoping this is it. I’ll give it a trial run of 3 or 4 weeks and gauge my progress.
Armor in D&D is a pain. There are a lot of assumptions about what should be available and the armor levels are a bit 'hard-wired' into our brains. If you start mucking around with what 'AC3' means there's some potential for misunderstanding. But maybe we can get away with making a three-piece suit equivalent to leather armor.
We also got the "all clear" to feed Adelyn any and everything (well, with the exception of honey and not too much fish). I was shocked to find out that she can even have peanut butter! I'm not sure that I am ready to give our 6month old peanut butter-maybe in a few months. :) Right now we will stick to working through all the veggies and fruits she has yet to try.
The taste follows the nose very closely, but it hides the booze very well. It tastes more of plums than figs and raisins, however they are still there, but the fruit seems far more fresh fruit than wrinkle fruit... Yes i said wrinkle fruit. The flavor profile stays consistant from start to finish, but it does finish cleaner than alot of its counterparts due to the fresher fruitness of the beer.
This is for the following challenge:
Actually, this is what most “discipleship” programs are all about. We are here to “make disciples” whatever that means. After all, part of the “great commission” (Matt. 28:19, 20) is to make disciples. We have interpreted this to mean that we are supposed to take individual believers and help them to be like Christ. Usually we do this by teaching them doctrine, how to study the bible, how to “pray”, how to serve God and others on the mission field, and basically how to be good Christians.
Below are a few useful pointers from the UN sections on supply chain and watershed management / collective action sections:
One year ago today, after returning from a Spring Break outing with The Girls, we decided to cool off in the pool. As I watched them splash and frolic, I logged onto FB and saw disturbing status updates from my friends and family back home in Alabama. Things like “angry skies here” and “debris falling in my yard y’all”. Immediately, I jerked up the phone and called my sister in North Alabama. Luckily, I got through, but what I heard on the other end was soul-shaking. My big sister, whom I’ve always known to be a pillar of strength, was crying hysterically. My own voice cracked, as I asked “What’s happening? Is everybody in our family okay? What do you need?”
Test of patience.
That one particular hardcover, the long awaited 5th book in George R. R. Martins "A Song of Ice and Fire" series "A Dance With Dragons", runs about 1100 pages, is about 3" thick, and weighs 3lbs 2.9 ounces.
Then how about Najib?
Don't forget to use the drop down menu for all my detailed episode notes, also check out the top tabs for additional insight to LOST.
Me: "Does it fit?"
The guests have ranged /will range from Evan Parker, extraordinary free sax improviser, through to members of the Orchestra of the Age of Enlightenment, a classical music ensemble interested in new ways of making new music. In between we've worked with master trumpeter Byron Wallen, Mira Calix, Manu Delago and Polar Bear drummer, Seb Rochford.
As a result, Malcolm was transferred to Exeter prison farm for his own protection and later, on his release, turned the explosive threat into a spectacular entertainment.
"No, it wasn't. Killing never is."
At his recent State of the Union Address, President Obama made it clear that the devaluing of the dollar and America’s reliance on credit are both continuing and disconcerting issues as we steam ahead in 2011. As a Personal Financial Planning major, I understand the need for people to get financial advice as investing and budgeting are very complex topics. In light of all this, I see a huge problem: my peers are out of touch of what is going on around them.
Place it into a blender with some water and blend it into a paste.
Since so many people close to me read this blog I will have to tread lightly by what I say about this. I'm not about to bring something out in the open about someone I know on my blog. But since it has everything to do with me I think its OK to, at least partially, talk about what's bothering me.
2) The hill. This is only a slight hill, but it came after 5 major hills, a few stops for breathing, and a couple bike-walking intervals. I need to get more exercise.
Today freedom of expression is almost universally defended at least in the West. But to test its limits in the real world by saying things that go against public opinion is quite another matter. It may totally destroy you as a public persona. Far better to defend free speech as a general concept with some buts added. Yes, free speech is a good idea and we all support it, but one should not say things that offend others, things that fly in the face of good taste and proper manners.
14. I am financially wealthy!
This is one of the comments from the Active Democracy Study Group
PUNJAB NATIO – Bse code – 532461 – last close – 920 – SELL – 925.4 – SL – 943.8 – for TG1 Rs. 908.6 and for TG2 Rs. 890.4 – stock opened at Rs. 918 hit intraday low Rs. 899 hit intraday high Rs. 924.9 stock was during trading down -2.3 % from previous close and closed at Rs 905.8
All three of us met up with the American and slowly made our way to find the fireworks. He wasn’t quite sure where they were and we ended up walking around for a long time. Eventually, between everyone’s extremely limited Vietnamese skills, we weren’t able to get directions to the fireworks. The American knew that there was a stage show going on, so we ended up going to that instead. It was some Vietnamese singer, singing Vietnamese songs, on a stage with a bunch of little Vietnamese kids all doing line dancing. It was kinda neat and really weird at the same time.
From an Edwardian childhood to service in a mobile VD clinic during World War Two his memoir is funny, acerbic and full of life, surely one of the most interesting books to be published this autumn. I particularly enjoyed his frankness as a botanist, his admission that he preferred the experts who supported his identification of a particular plant and confession that many plants bored him silly. Here's the opening:
May 1st, or May Day, falls halfway between the spring equinox and the summer solstice. Like Samhain (Halloween), it’s supposed to be a time when the veils of the two worlds are at their thinnest. Fairies come back into the warming world, led by their queen on a white horse and bring with them plenty of magic and mischief. Rowan branches on the windowsill are a traditional protection against their antics.
I made two batches of this recipe, one the day before and one the day I made it, and they came out with equal results. So, if you're planning to make this for a holiday dinner, it's definitely easy to prepare ahead of time! I left mine sit out at room temperature so that it would have a similar cooking time as the ones I made the same day, but I mixed everything and arranged it in the gratin dishes ahead of time. You could also easily make this in a larger baking dish, making sure to check the asparagus for doneness and all of that, but it may take some extra time. But, I'm sure you could certainly find a way to justify buying a couple of gratin dishes of your very own, too... ;-)
Ken Kesey by the side of Dale Evans.
Life on Barsoom flourished… and evolved quickly. By the time the solar system was four billion years old (about a billion years ago, more or less), life on Terra had progressed to the point where there were simple animals, some even practicing sexual reproduction. Hope they had fun! By that point, however, life on Barsoom had evolved to a point equivalent to current-era life on Terra, including the appearance of sentient life.
Mom! Mom! Don’t go down that street! What if the car explodes! My children are yelling at me but I can’t hear them. I inch closer. There’s a bank with a drive through right before the corner. My plan is to turn in there and proceed down the boulevard, away from it all. After all, we’re already in the thick of it. If we try to turn around we’ll likely get caught in the roadblock and where will that leave us? I need the diversions of the kids’ activities like I need air. It’s much better, I think to myself, to just see this through.
Over 80 designers, FIVE shopping sprees each day. No one knows where the prizes will be! Each day of the hop JustRite will have five Mystery Blog Candy Prizes hidden along the hop with a total retail value of $600. JustRite will randomly select five mystery blogs each day of the hop and randomly allocate each of the shopping sprees. For your chance to win, simply leave a little love (a comment) on each designer’s blog including the JustRite blog. The more designers you leave comments with, the better your chances of winning. Each day’s comments will remain open for three days. A winner from each of the mystery blogs’ comments will be randomly chosen using Random.org. Consult the listing of designers at the JustRite blog each day (each day’s designers will be different) and start out on your way! Beginning Friday, March 26, summaries of all the winners will be posted on the JustRite blog. Good luck to everyone and enjoy all the JustRite eye candy along the hop!
array of chocolate concoctions. During the festival, they were serving chocolate skulls paired with the Breckenridge Distillery Bourbon. Woowee! That was some pairing. You can purchase some of their products online, including Albatross (chocolate, blue cheese, salted fudge), Tequila infused chocolate sauce, and Tub of Love (Italian Hazelnut spread).
Chewchewchewchewchewchewsmackchewchewchewchewbubblesmackchewchewchewchew.
Join Karen Burniston for a class featuring products from several new CHA releases to make four projects in sweet, cute Spring colors. You'll get a chance to try Scoreboards by Eileen Hull, NEW large Sizzlit designs by Scrappy Cat, and critter dies by Dena Designs that are sure to make you say "Awwww!" (Papers and cardstocks by Bazzill Basics.)
His love lives in the two eyes,
Been reading a novel courtesy of sister. Interesting book dealing with loneliness, transience, memory and loss. Here are two chunks towards the end of the novel which I really like:
A great writer once said “Sometimes You Have Problems and That’s Totally Okay Because I Have Lots of Them and Sometimes Give Them To Other People. Let’s Talk About Them Now.”
I made a pillow today. I had some leftover pieces of fabric with an adorable Chinese toile pattern on it that is perfect for a pillow front. I shopped for something to complement the back and came up with a nice stripe in French blues… just perfect with this toile.
In Exodus 1-10, the story goes like this ..God's chosen people, Israel, was taken into bondage by the Egyptians. There they suffered and multiplied. After 400 some years, the Lord decreed that the time had arrived for Israel's to occupy her own land. The two main characters that played a major role in the eventual exodus were Moses and the pharaoh. Moses was meek and allowed himself to be led by the hand of God giving way to succeed in delivering Israel from bondage with great and might miracles. On the flip side, the pharaoh, was self-centered, power hungry, cruel, and hard-hearted. He preferred to follow the counterfeit power of Satan, which allowed him the false belief that he was a god on earth. Bad move Mr. Pharaoh!
Next in my lead up to International IPA day on August 4th(1 week to go folks!) is another Belgian beer and I have to say.....Wow!
Sitting here in the early hours of the morning Internet was down and I was reflecting on how upsetting that was to me. The Internet has given me a new freedom and facility to communicate with others far beyond what I ever had before, and has given me the opportunity to socialise freely in a way to that I never could. I have always found conversing with other people a burden, I can do it, but I dislike it. I am reasonably content to listen to others as long as they are being interesting, occasionally they are. Communicating online, as I have said before and will probably say many times more, gives me the opportunity to edit my thoughts before bestowing them on others. When I am at my computer I am generally away from other distractions which also makes communicating easier; face to face interactions are too frequently conducted under circumstances where competing stimuli make meaningful exchange difficult.
- Placed deposit with our ID last friday to confirm him. Phew.
THESE YOUTUBE VIDEOS DESERVE TO BE DELETED!!!
With the advent of news aggregation and RSS services pretty much anyone can be a media mogul. This post covers how to create an information portal for your specific niche. It requires a RSS feed reader and an hour or two of your time. I use Google Reader, as it works anywhere there’s an Internet connection and it’s free.
Catch 22
The Koch Brothers oh so sadly were just out prowling around
So, conclusions from this excursion: strike Suzie’s and strike Block 8. Definitely go to Mesh Bar, and try and visit Tang Club – it wasn’t the best club I’d been to, but I’d go back again out of pure sociological/anthropological curiosity.
So I know everyone and their mom is on the fiddle fig tree train.
Ed Morrissey notes:
What you should know. Leda and Bonnie actually got to collaborate on this book, in a manner that authors and illustrators typically do not.
Dawn also has two separate Facebook pages; one for their website Dawn.com, and another for the Dawn News TV channel. TheDawn.com page has 58,842 followers with 894 talking about this, while the Dawn News page has 85,639 with 1,700 talking about this.
handblown beads, and
Tuesday 7th February
Oh, I liked that one. It was cute, sweet, and funny—all the qualities director William Goodrich was aiming for in The Red Mill. And he achieves it again about midway through, when Tina, due to circumstances well-within her control, must present herself as a regal beauty before Dennis, who’s unaware she’s the frozen maid from the winter previous. Tina sits alone at a makeup table; products she’s never heard of (and does not own) lain out before her. She picks up a jar of facial mud. ‘One application guarantees Perpetual Beauty,” promises the jar. Tina smears it over her face, letting it harden into a mask, then pulls it away, revealing a glowing new visage. She’s the same Marion Davies, actually; just luminescent where before, we’re to believe, she was plain. And actually, she was never plain, especially compared to the rogues’ gallery arrayed around her in The Red Mill, but the cynicism about beauty—in the eye of the beholder as always, but the product, too, of chemistry and a succession of masks—in a romantic comedy, no less—is special.
Nothing works.
Nor do I have a clear sense of time. Sometimes it feels as if he died just a couple of months ago. Sometimes it feels like years. The demarcation between our shared life and my solitary life was once so stark it was like the edge of a cliff. All I could see was the past and what I had lost. The living I have done in the past nine months has blurred that edge, adding to the sense of unreality.
The difficulty for me is in unpacking the term Black identity as a white person. I can learn about various habits or social norms that are intrinsically linked to a black community, but I’m not sure that really means I understand the depths and essence of being black. Are those things ever really able to be learned, except artificially? I feel like identity is such a personal thing that try as we might the only identity we’ll really full comprehend is our own. I think identity doesn’t just come from the culture we are from or the way we’re raised, but also from the choices we make in everyday of our lives. That’s how I feel I can best relate to people, whether they are black, white, rich, poor, or anything in between.
Feel the carnal impulse
between pillows and continents.
...of wasting time on the internet. From Blogger to Twitter to Stumble to eBay to Craigslist to Petfinder to Facebook to watching-grass-grow to Flickr...the list just goes on and on...I never have time to watch Divorce Court or especially the Beverly Hillbillies anymore in my free time..stupid internet! Stop being so fun!
Heather Draper - I don’t believe the design of the room should be the most important element, but rather ,the people in it. To me a great room should whisper sophistication, elegance and interest, softly, to those who chose to listen.
1 grated onion
When drones were first used abroad they were primarily implemented for surveillance. Ultimately they have been used to kill.
Poor Roshan Seth was never really used as much as he could have been - we still recall, with great fondness and awe, the subtle genius of his performance in Gandhi (particularly when he confronts Gandhiji after one of the fasts) and the wondrous, dreamy texture of his take on a displanted Ugandan in Mississippi Masala (maybe the only movie where he gets his due). That man could be soulful, people! Such a Long Journey is a rare chance for him to play the lead, and it's intriguing and, ultimately, very satisfying to watch his complex, whiny, miserable, redeemable Gustad. Naseeruddin Shah and Om Puri - the usual stalwarts - have very little to do, but it's nice to see them (especially Om Om Om Puri!). Soni Razdan did what she could, given that - yet again - the ladies get relegated to being concerned mothers, shrewish crones, whores or sexualized secretaries. Oh yeah, or Indira Gandhi.
“In the city, dating revolves around the sort of places to which you can’t take children, such as bars and clubs.”
At almost 4, however, the Pumpkin starts to get SO upset when we tell her she can't have something, but then I hold up a finger and say, "Hey, hey, hey! Don't you want to hear why you can't do it?" And she stops freaking out, asks to hear why, and then usually understands the reason and is either okay with it or comes up with a compromise or something that works for us all.
I was trying to get my boots back on after walking through the metal detector, they were asking to look through my purse, and I noticed the carrier coming through the x-ray machine, turned upside down. And then, as I was bent over, trying to wrangle my boots on, Milo still clinging to me, I saw a turd on the floor! Oh, the horror. Everything was so frantic and in disarray, I didn’t know what to do. I wanted to just bolt. But all these innocent people in their socks! I couldn’t let them step in cat crap and then have to sit on a plane for six or eight hours. Nasty. I grabbed one of the wee wee pads from Milo’s bag (just because I’m moving to Paris doesn’t make me instantly chic) and cleaned it up. Got him in the bag, got my boots on, and got the hell out of there.
I didn't realize how much damage he did to me until he left. Until I was on Jetta, my-heart-horse-of-a- lifetime-who-would-never-do-anything-to-hurt-me, and the fear reared it's ugly head and smacked me in the face.
in the same way
It's going to be nothing but scorched earth from Newtie for the next two weeks or so, and to hell (literally) with anyone who stands in his way.
It was not too long, however, before Nolan went into the living room to play and saw the gifts Santa left by the fireplace - then there was the exclamation of - OH WOW SANTA CAME, followed by I go wake up daddy. Then the presents were ripped open by Nolan - and yes that is his 'oh wow' face of complete happiness as he opened up Belle and Flynn and Mavis and Salty and train track and train housing and a turntable for his Thomas the Train set.
In February, plan overseers lowered the assumed rate of return on investments to 7.5 percent from 7.75 percent. The change retroactively added $3.5 billion to the system's funding gap as of June, according to the plan report.
Based on the evidence presented in this book, both Ms. Rand and Mr. Etounga-Manguella would have agreed that South Africans had been tossed into the metaphorical cannibal’s pot. Washington and Westminster insisted that the country pass into the hands of a voracious majority. Unwise South African leaders acquiesced. Federalism was discounted. Minority rights for the Afrikaner, Anglo and Zulu were dismissed. Ironically, America’s founding fathers had attempted to forestall raw democracy by devising a republic. Yet under the wing of the American eagle a dispensation was negotiated in this writer’s former homeland, the consequence of which is the raw, ripe rule of the mob and its dominant, anointed party.
*the jingle of Lonnie dogs collar
Take ACTION! By now you will have greater clarity and with that comes certainty. But it’s easy to just go with the good feeling of knowing you have a goal and the “prospect” of achieving it and so often people stop here. The journey hasn’t started yet! You need to take step 5 and that is, ACTION. You have to do something, anything, from the list you generated in step 4. Start anywhere, you will quickly learn what you don’t know and what you need to do in more detail so with practice you will become very resourceful (which comes in abundance by the way, you just have to start, strangely, magic happens!)
Take, for example, television: every single program you see is based on something that came prior - be it a concept, a genre or even a particular type of character.
PTI Terracotta Tile button
Into Thin Air by Jon Krakauer. This was another book that just really stuck with me. The story is of a fateful climb up Mt. Everest, and I learned so much about climbers and what motivates them and the sacrifices that they make to do what they do.
This recipe is an adaptation from the book "on a stick" from Matt Armendariz. Sis.bloom. thought it was the perfect skewer to bring to a BBQ.
Happy Monday lovelies!
He is liking most solids we give him. So far he likes oatmeal, rice, pears, apples, sweet potatoes, zucchini, squash, peas, carrots, avocado, asparagus, and his absolute favorite is bananas! Sometimes I think he will turn into a banana. He opens his mouth like a baby bird and then goes “mmmmm” after each bite. Now, he is also grabbing the spoon to feed himself.
She lived in Long Beach, and was a great advocate for the city. It was her convincing arguments (along with the fact it's my wife's hometown) that led us to buy a house and move here. We even used her realtor because Paula said he was the best. And if she thought so, there was no reason for us not to.
- Tristan Thompson looked great. Even though Omri Casspi didn't impress much (and I think I just heard for the first time in my life on the Kings/Lakers game "What hustle from JJ Hickson!") Thompson should fill Hickson's dangling mouthguard just fine. He had a couple of great dunks (great, as in high percentage shot), and filled the paint nicely unlike EVERY single other "big man" on this team. He makes a great dunk and energizes the crowd, the Cavs are down four, and Scott goes to #4 Jamison and takes out the rookie. Apologies to Gregg Easterbrook, but at that point I wrote "Game Over" in my mental notebook.
While I know that a lot of people see Wiccan’s as being elitist snobs, as an insider these days, I sort of get it. Wicca in general has worked for years to put together a religion that gets things done that a lot of eclectics can’t manage without years of study and training. But if Wicca and it’s traditions can’t get their acts together, how can they possibly survive and do they deserve to? That would be a blog for another day…
Here in SoCal, the world stops with a speeding drop of rain. I can’t imagine a major catastrophe here. As I picked my way through the markets this weekend, I was grateful for our consistently perfect weather, which contributes to consistently great produce. Can you ever have too many tomatoes? No, I don’t think so. I use what I grow in the garden, supplemented by heirlooms from Valdivia~
Morning, Sunshines! Hope you had a lovely weekend.
Fear comes from uncertainty, and in the weeks before you enter the forest, you begin to wonder whether you will walk straight through this year. Or, whether, as in years gone by, you will lose your way in the endless turnings of oak, pine and briar. Will you be retracing lost steps over and over with vanished memory of where you once began and where you are headed? Helplessly etching imprints on tree trunks in the hope that if you happen to return this way, you will recognise your hand amongst the many, scratched in bark by the others who have lost their way too?
Did they have the right to elect an abortion if armed with that knowledge? Yes.
blue milk: Thank you for the very thought-provoking responses.
A reception dress is usually a gown which is not as traditional and modest as the gown you wear for your ceremony. Bride who need more coverage for a religious ceremony may opt for a more modest design for the ceremony and a sexier gown for the party.
You’ll become aligned to receive, give, and become more interesting too, since gaining a new perspective (maybe)! Now how does all this happen? Quite simply, give yourself what you would like others to do for you!
I'll bet my bottom dollar you will have his heart beating at a fast canter, his breath catching in his throat, and soon he will be all over you! And for the next week he will have you, and only you on his mind.....and more than likely planning the next adventure.
3. When We Escape – Minus The Bear
Simply, they could be written by me. I really feel them. They're "mine".
I now believe in Jesus;
And the Piece de resistance, the banana peel found in my car today. The only way I knew it was a banana peel was from the Chiquita sticker. Ok, this trend of finding food is getting embarrassing, quite frankly. I can understand the occasional fruit snack in the couch cushions, cracker under the chair, wrapper behind the dresser, and French fry on the floor of my car, but this is ridiculous. My wonderful husband cleaned out my van today. He filled the tires with air, the tank with gas, and he washed it inside and out. I'd like to say this disgusting banana was all he found, but alas he found enough nasty, moldy fruit to cover Carmen Miranda's head. I think I may have to put locks on the fridge and cabinets.
A Morgan earlier than either of these liars was of course the infamous Morgan the Pirate, a man who (like Piers) left school early, declaring himself “more used to the pike than the book.” This is undoubtedly true of Piers-y-poo, who allegedly thinks that a Penguin Classic is an original-flavour chocolate biscuit. The genes are obviously still intact:
Today we have had a looooong lie in and we loved it. Even little bug slept late allowing us to enjoy a rare day with absolutely nothing to do. Don't you just love those days? In a world of rushing and deadlines and pressure we treasure everyday of nothing.
I made this birthday card for the Peachy Keen Challenge this week anything goes. I wanted to be able to use the stamp of the month set for March and also February.
We were trying to leave Saturday to drive McArmy's truck down to El Paso. The kid really needs his wheels.
Consider Hilary Putnam’s “Twin Earth” argument. Imagine, the argument goes, a Twin Earth: one that is molecule for molecule identical to this Earth. Of course you will have a Twin Earth doppelganger, molecule for molecule identical to yourself. On a reductive materialist account, granting that you have physically identical brain states it follows that you have psychologically identical mental states. For example you will have identical beliefs about water, the colorless, odorless substance that is ubiquitous in your parallel worlds. But imagine that there was just one difference between Earth and Twin Earth: on Earth water is composed of H20, but on Twin Earth water is composed of XYZ. Now everything about you and your doppelganger – both your physical states and your mental contents – are identical, but they’re not the same. Your beliefs may be correct and his/hers false (he/she may believe, as you do, that water is H20), but at a minimum they are about different things. Thus the actual meaning of an intentional state cannot be determined either by its physical properties or, startlingly, by its mental properties (its causal properties that can only be explained with reference to its contents).
Robin S Show me love US
become a grandmother...
On the prisons:
the balance of my girls' privacy
while the water is boiling slice the fennel bulb and onion in half. slice into thin crescents. Heat the olive oil in a large saute pan. saute the onions and fennel until very soft. remove from the pan. brown the sausage in the same pan. when it is almost fully cooked add the onion/fennel back. cook until the sausage is cooked and the onion is beginning to brown. in a small bowl mix the water with the tomato paste until smooth. add teh pepper flakes. pour into the sausage mixture. cook for 5 minutes on medium heat. stir in the cheese and the fennel fronds.
My firstborn started kindergarten yesterday and I started my fire.
A mysterious notebook .
He has returned from the wars a hero to his people, savior of their Empire and honored as such, but his world is empty, despite the peace he has won for his people. There is no light where he lives, no soft touch to comfort him, to push away the darkness of his memories. He lives only to serve his King and the world he lives in. He is the High Lord General Gabriel Eagle Claw, Commander of the Combined Elven forces Sent into the outside world to bring their people home he travels with his troop to the valley where he has been told they await his coming. There he is to find the Life Mate to the King and bring her safely to his side, but there is more, for there is a mystery he must solve and claim for his own. She who will bring light and love to his soul, she is his Eden. His one and only, his true Life Mate, his love and he vows he will bind her to him forever.
Becuase I was a teenager and just to irritate my parents, I went to the University of Oregon (which my dad hated) and studied Art (which my mom was opposed to). I earned a Bachelor of Fine Arts in Multimedia Design with a Minor in Journalism Communication (Advertising). I graduated a year early and I got to study cool things like animation, sculpture, (almost had a minor in geology), photojournalism, advertising, and all sorts of cool things. One of my professors, Ken (who is important later on) taught comic drawing classes and animation classes. I liked Ken because he would let us explore in whatever direction our art would take us, as long as we were productive.
While there are Biblical difficulties I have not resolved, I am at ease with my ignorance because I know from experience that there is a long history of finding reasonable answers to apparent contradictions in the Bible, and I know faith in the God of Christianity is the only reasonable place to put my faith.
If you come on a free admission be sure to get a Summer Day Pass for $20or individual attraction tickets. There are so many things to see and do that this place requires multiple return trips.
Ah, so he went to Brazil to find himself a cook that would sleep with him. That was all he wanted.
Another communication problem: there's a hospital chain that is our main account. We are all set up to sign in and chart at all the hospitals in that chain. A couple of months ago, word came down-- 2nd, 3rd and fourth-hand-- of a new way to chart the dialysis treatments. It was, we were told, mandatory. Here's the problem: five different people told me five different ways to do this mandatory way of charting.
Over-confidence was crippling, petty wounds were stark and raw
M: But sometimes those who are starting lose themselves in all the multiple options.
Because I am more honest
2) Arrogance & Oddity There was certainly a feeling amongst some fans that rising through the non-league pyramid was an absolute inconvenience as they approached that which they were righteously owed. And sometimes this arrogance grated on non-league fans. But others, both Dons & (blown away) rivals, embraced the oddity of it all, particularly in the first few years where thousands would invade afterthoughts of pitches more used to the proverbial two men and a dog.
On the first of May, International Workers’ Day, we salute the Palestinian homeland – the workers and peasants, men and women, youth and elders, everywhere they are, in Palestine or in diaspora and exile.
Enjoy the color surrounding you!
April lays her head back on Ella’s chest. Speaking softly, she says, “And I have a mama, but she doesn’t want me. She gave me to Tucker.”
by Alex Young
Andy texted me when he went down for the scan because he wasn't sure if they would be out in time for what he called the "ray gun" appointment. I called the radiation center and let them know.
No matter. Amazon simply disregarded these publishers’ wishes, and enrolled many of their titles in the program anyway. Some of these publishers learned of Amazon’s unilateral decision as the first news stories about the program appeared.
You know what? Cathy picked a good theme because that's not as easy as it seems. We seem to naturally go for all of those fun papers we hoard. And, sassy friends, that's why it's called a challenge!! Here's what Sassy Cathy and the Sassy team created this week to share with you...
2 school
When I was working, we would also use the pagers for "nervous moms". You know, those moms that drop their kids off, but their hesitant about leaving them. You slap a pager on their pocket and they feel instantly connected knowing you'll page if their kids don't quit crying.
Corporal Grant fired yet another AP missile at the advancing beast, but once again, the round impacted in front of the creature and merely stunned it. Grant cursed whoever it was that had made the batch of missiles he had been issued with. The creature shook itself once more, turned towards Grant and took a few paces.
We’ll be using Skype to do voice chat during this meetup. So if you don’t have an account, add one for free at skype.com. Then add StreetPassArkansas to your contact list.”
CONTENT CONTENT CONTENT ( Check out this link for an example of specific content that works) - Use pictures, videos, podcasts, newlestters, blogs, graphics, words etc. that are specific to your target market.If done correctly your customers will come back because of their special interest and your content that keeps you connected. This can help build relationships with your customers.
The cabal is dead and will not rise again. We know that from the channeled messages we read and I believe we could know that from no other source. That’s the value of listening to credible channeled messages.
I'm not like a crazy cat lady or anything but at Christmas we would break out a Christmas outfit because Indy was sure to be there in the middle of helping decorate the house.
“If you want… We can head back to the forest clearing and see if anything comes back to you.” Naida suggested casually.
did you wrap
And quite naturally, as I'm attempting to calm Tracy down with some gentle pushing, Tony rises up from the ground and throws a punch straight at me mouth. I could step away from it, but I don’t. I let the punch connect with the side of me face and feel me head thrust to the side -
Total Wine & More
Cupcake stamp is from Hero Arts, Sister sentiment is from Imagine That and the small circle is a stamp from Paula Pascual. All topped off with some Twinklets Diamond dust and some glossy accents for the cherry on top.
If tonight you’re still struggling with worries unnecessarily, take some time to yourself and listen to the words of one of my favorite hymns – All to Jesus I Surrender. When you’re done with listening to the song, say this simple prayer to the Lord: Heavenly Father, I am tired of handling things on my own. I’m tired of worrying, being scared, feeling overwhelmed, etc… Lord please give me the strength and the wisdom to surrender all to You. Thank you for offering to take it all from me. God, I accept Your offer and freely surrender all at Your feet. Please God replace everything I’ve surrendered with joy and peace that surpass all understanding. Help me Lord to always trust You and to continue to surrender all. I pray this in the name of Jesus. Amen.”
Looking back on that period from the distance of the White House, Obama recalled that he was then “deep inside my own head … in a way that in retrospect I don’t think was real healthy.” But the realization that he had to “absorb all the traditions” would become the rationale for everything that followed. “There is no doubt that what I retained in my politics is a sense that the only way I could have a sturdy sense of identity of who I was depended on digging beneath the surface differences of people,” Obama said during an interview. “The only way my life makes sense is if, regardless of culture, race, religion, tribe, there is this commonality, these essential human truths and passions and hopes and moral precepts that are universal. And that we can reach out beyond our differences. If that is not the case, then it is pretty hard for me to make sense of my life. So that is at the core of who I am.”
1/2 cup + 3 tablespoons sugar
So amidst all the unpacking we found “the perfect disguise” and a chicken puppet. The kids couldn’t resist and started singing the Chicken Boo theme song from the Animaniacs series and then posed(well some of them.) for the camera.
Emotionally it seems healthier to separate the idea that sex and love are always present at that same time, in every intimate situation because as most of discover in our mid-twenties, that isn’t always true. If you can take control of your sexual identity it can help in every aspect of a relationship. It can help develop a relationship.
Eli...how do you describe Eli but pure cuteness? Even when he throws himself on the floor in slow-mo in an attempt at a fit, we still find ourselves having to hide the laugh building up at how comical he looks! He's an AVID Ranger fan....LOVES baseball! It is not uncommon these days to see him pretending to 'throw a ball' at you so you can pitch it back to him, while he 'batter's up!' I'm enclosing a video so you can see just how much fun he has doing this! He loves his drumset almost as much as baseball. He's your typical boy, in to everything, making messes, hopping around, and loving life to the fullest. I love when he comes to sit next to me and cuddle up, and when he sits right next to daddy to watch the Rangers play. He and Jadyn LOVE cuddles! And for that, I am grateful. I know the day will come when neither one of them want cuddles and hugs!
I had a pretty bad week last week, which, objectively wasn’t so bad in the larger scheme of things, but it was taxing emotionally and physically. I’ve been “looking” for an apartment for almost two months now, and it seems like that’ll have to go up to three. Anyone who’s tried the NYC apartment game understands; it’s frustrating and hard whether you go through a broker, Craigslist, or some other channel.
Back in the early and mid-70's I lived on a block (a dead-end block as we call it ~ GREAT For StickBall!! I digress) that bordered the cemetery; East 45 Street. I don't remember but my neighbors in the years since 72' told me of the incredible sight which was the procession bringing Gil to Holy Cross. It passed our block. I was 5 yrs old when he left us.
‘I had to smother her. First he wanted me to strangle her; I said, ‘No, I’m not putting my hands on her.’ He said, ‘Use the pillow.’ After it was all said and done, I went back to the neighborhood and nobody said a word.’
If this isn’t art then I don’t know what it is… Simply beautiful! Hajime, thank you.
She is like her mother in that most of her actions toward others are motivated by her own losses and gains, but she has her father’s mildness. She reminds me of Isabella in many ways.
Elizabeth Vallone possesses a B.A. and M.S. degree from Montclair State University and Long Island University. She is a teacher and freelance writer. A contributing author to the anthologies Imprints on Rockland County History (1983) and Curragia: Writings of Italian-American Women (1998), Mrs. Vallone published Stone Perpendicular to Stone—A Tribute to the Land of My Ancestors in 1997. In 2005, Beyond Bagheria, a first attempt at historical fiction set in the New Orleans of the 1920s was published. Mrs. Vallone is currently working on historical fiction set in WWI Hoboken, NJ. She lives in Rockland County with her husband.
Bow RV00,10,32, At You Spica Blossom
I’ve plunged myself into fierce moving water, thrown scorching hot, melted rocks at them, tried shaking them off with extremely powerful shudders, spun myself around and around creating a vortex of tornado-force winds, I’ve even tried to burn them off like ticks – nothing works. They’re still hanging on. Yup-yup-yup they’re extremely persistent these people-lice; exceptionally determined.
Also, another edge is in customization of guns and emblems. In Black Ops, you can create you own custom emblem from scratch and even put it on all of your guns. There is a lot more variety in colors and designs on your guns. Giving the player customization to make what they want, makes any game better.
First, I want to share a few pictures from a little learning adventure we had a few weeks ago. We visited the greenhouses of Mr. Randolph Maphis in Talahassee, Florida. He is one of the premier camellia growers in the country and we were totally in awe of his beautiful plants and flowers.
The only thing I didn't love about this dish was the shape and stiffness of the gnocchi - they looked cocoon-like to me, especially in the dimly lit dining room. But the sweetbreads and everything else on the plate was fantastic.
Police Employing Military Torture Technology
Good evening from Bagram Air Base. This outpost is more than 7,000 miles from home, but for over a decade it’s been close to our hearts. Because here, in Afghanistan, more than half a million of our sons and daughters have sacrificed to protect our country.
One of the ladies on our link list below will be picking a name from the comments on her blog post today. We don’t know which one it is… so the more blogs you leave comments on, the more chances you have to win! The design team truly created some stunning creations with this new set...
Christopher Uptake, a young playwright, is an atheist. In the crowded city, he thinks no one will notice that he never attends church – until the red-haired man appears at his door and gives him a choice: spy on your friends or be tortured and executed.
“Don’t even think about it!” I replied.
Planets: Saturn
Tottenham drew level with Man United for all of 72 hours, after winning their game in hand against Everton. But they then drew at home to Wolves, a dent to any team’s title prospects. Personally I don’t see them winning it, they’ve too many away games to the big sides with only Man United of the ”big six” to visit White Hart Lane before the campaing’s end. Spurs will be without Emmanuel Adebayor for this one as part of the loan arrangement with City.
4. It's Up To You
so that I can joyfully give thanks to the Father, who has qualified you (and me!) to share in the inheritance of the saints in the kingdom of light!…Col 1:12
June 29 West Chester, PA Emile K Asplundh Concert Hall, 700 South High Street
Zephaniah
Back to struggling, it's my process.
Do I pick the ones that make me laugh? The ones that defy logic? The ones that leave me going WTF?
I had this carrot cake awhile back from Forty Hands. While I appreciated the generous amount of shredded carrot in the cake itself, I didn’t like the frosting at all. It was flavoured with orange juice, overpowering the flavours of the cake itself.
early in the a.m., you better have a good plan
The true spirit of scientific enquiry!
(1)Since the mom-to-be loved peonies, we found peony-patterned fabric and wrapped the fabric around peony arrangements. Remember when I twitpic'ed this picture? I was shopping for fabric to wrap up the vases. It is a simple and very inexpensive way to instantly dress up your vases.
I should have known that the village would come through for one of its sons with questions galore. I should have realized that this particular village is too damn intelligent for its own good and the questions would be hard. With sight of the hind, I should have set this thing up like Jeopardy! on TV: I give simple answers and the contestants (y'all) give simple questions.
As far as reading and writing experience goes, I've always loved reading. I often used to read the back of the cereal box and the milk carton every morning! The librarians in my local library and at school knew me by name. It was common for me to read two books at once; one at school and one at home and I perfected reading and doing other things at the same time. At work I parked my car a fifteen minute walk away and would read walking along the street.
I’d like to share a presentation given by our great coach Dan Kenzie.
Me: “Okay. Thanks.”
The Secretary of Health and Human Services with respect to health resources;
Just add a gingham ribbon ( maybe a nice table runner )and pronto.
Leaves smothered
“No it wouldn’t. Jesus has a sense of humor. He’d think it’s cool,” Mike said.
Each time I’m buckling my 5-year-old into his car seat on the way to another of his peers’ birthday parties, I say a little prayer that there will be beer. Read the rest here. Bacon Barleywine!
Citing an earlier Deliotte & Touche study, The Acacia presentation breaks down patent licensing for some of the biggest players:
Macedonian Thrace Brewery Vergina
This morning though, I wanted to share another bagel inspiration. This one is simple (sort of). I drizzled a little Tasmanian Leatherwood Honey on our toasted cinnamon raisin bagel.
I really wanted to get at least 6 of these but sadly with Home Goods every thing is in limited supply and unless you get there 1st you end up getting the left overs. Luckily after a little research, I was able to find almost identical bowls at shopko.com and ordered 4 more ... they should be arriving sometime early this week so fingers crossed that they'll be a match!
Update – For people who ask, the poor rating has been given because of the following reasons: -
Firstly - Bristol. What a lovely city. We had a great time. Of course I only really took photos of the kids, which is poor blogging behaviour. I won't bore you with them, don't worry, but these pictures manage to capture something about my eldest two children.
hubbkf and i celebrated 27 years of wedded bliss on saturday…we had a lovely, lovely day…actually, it’s been a lovely, lovely life together…oh, yes we’ve had our *difficult* stages, but hey…all in all, i can’t imagine my life with somebody else…guess i feel like alfred does towards leann…and i hope hubbkf can appreciate that sentiment…
...which is what we spent last night doing.
Courtesy of The Guardian
Since our return from the frozen north, I've been laid low with the worst case of flu ever recorded on this earth. I've only been operating at about 30%, so J has been doing the cooking and washing up. I've just been able to maintain doing the laundry or having a shower, before stumbling to the couch and collapsing in a pathetic, coughing, sneezing, aching, wheezing wreck; waiting for the room to cease its crazy whirling, and the polka-dotted elephants to stop dancing before my eyes.
Beatles Eleanor rigby UK
6. I have a love of beautiful tattoos.
“Rothman, sir, I believe we have concluded the Hagglesmith mission, and so I would like to collect my reward, whatever it may be,” said Hermel politely.
Center a rack in the oven and preheat the oven to 400F.
I've mentioned Chanticleer, our attack rooster, before. Here he is strutting his stuff in front of the chicken run like he owns the place.
In sum, it’s the same tireless attack upon benefit claimants, the ignorance of capitalist social and production relations and the deflection of blame and responsibility from those at the top and those in power.
I got so much more out of it than I ever knew I would.
What’s more, children who have had music lessons tend to have a larger vocabulary and better reading ability than youngsters who haven’t had any musical training. And children with learning disabilities, who often have a hard time focusing when there’s a lot of background noise, may be especially helped by music lessons. “Music training seems to strengthen the same neural processes that often are deficient in individuals with developmental dyslexia or who have difficulty hearing speech in noise,” Dr. Kraus stated.
The Thief Who Came To Dinner
Silver Elastic Cord
Why had Zanna run off, when she’d appeared so happy to be marrying James? And what would the poor man say to her if he found her?
The same investing principle applies to US retail giant Walmart Stores, another of Mr Buffett’s core stock holdings.
emailing, doing Aim, etc., she ran circles around me.
The world doesn't stand in dire need of another online story outlet. (But another one certainly can't hurt, either.) While Seizure does publish a certain number of short stories, however, the central aim of Seizure is to publish novels--serialized at first in both digital and hardcopy form, and then, if markets, money and whatever allow, as standalone books.
And lead us not into deep union,
Bull among Bulls: Vṛṣṇi-ṛṣabha is a sophisticated alliteration. One meaning is that Kṛṣṇa is the most powerful (ṛṣabha) of his dynasty, the Vṛṣṇi. Another meaning is that Kṛṣṇa is the bull (ṛṣa) among bulls (vṛṣa), which means that he is the best and most powerful of all the best and most powerful men.
it all hurts just the same.
Are you going for the much-hyped Bersih 3.0 sit-in rally at Dataran Merdeka, or would you rather spend your Saturday afternoon at home?
After finishing Debra's panties two weeks ago, I was asked to sew up another school uniform shirt. A shirt that normally would take about 3 hours (tops!) took most of last week to sew. Debra has decided that she no longer needs a nap. Most sewing now takes place after her bedtime. Unfortunately, I'm not a night owl. I go to bed fairly early myself.
Black Beans
I believe the inspiration from her is only beginning.
My heart implores that
Serve this with fries, smashed taters, salad, whatever you like.
Black War Bear – For the Alliance!
Past that house
LIFE is Good 2011 was not a perfect conference. Things went wrong. Pranks were pulled. Friends' gifts to each other went missing. Another friend spent the end of the conference grieving the loss of her mother. Even so, I loved it. It made me happy. It gave me some more amazing memories to add to my burgeoning "Unschooler Love" file, and I received a good dose of inspiration and renewal. I came away smiling, energized, exhausted, and content with my life.
Their 1813 uniforms were quite straight forward… covered shakos, Prussian Blue Kollet jackets with red collars and cuffs as well as a Kummerbund edged in red and red piping to their grey overall trousers. The “saddlecloth” was black wool skin with red edging. Now what caused me some problems were their shoulder boards. There is a Knötel and Lezius Sturm cigarette card depicting a trooper from the Brandenburg Uhlanen with red shoulder boards.
Life is a whirlwind. Notice I didn't say tornado--so maybe I'm dealing with things a little better today than I was last week. Life is life, and we each have to make choices...and for those of you who sent words of wisdom-friendship-or are praying, I say thanks. I won't rehash all of the details--because today I'm turning over a new leaf... which just so happens to be an old leaf--which is I think, I might be back...
Planting in areas of high pollution, for instance ‘hotspots’ such as traffic junctions and traffic lights, will yield proportionately greater rates of pollutant removal. Trees planted in conjunction with understory plants to leeward of air pollution sources can maximise pollutant scrubbing by plants.
· 1/2 lb. chicken breast, cut into small pieces (I use Thai fishcake)
Now you see why I wrote ‘IT’S MUCH HARDER THAN YOU THINK!’ In capitals in the first part of this three-part post. But don’t be disheartened, just add these three points to the challenge pile, roll up your sleeves, and get stuck in. Publishers DO take on picture book texts in rhyme, they just set the bar very high, that’s all.
choice of public or high school library, along with a selection of bookmarks.
and your soul will delight in the richest of fare.
I'm just back from a short hop to Nairobi this week. We had an event for work on Friday which I was asked to attend so I combined it with a few days based in our Nairobi office.
Welcome new followers! Feel free to leave comments, I love them and smile when I read them. Anonymous comments are also accepted in case you aren't signed in or found me from another blog site.
Your best bet is to shop around. Fortunately, it is below the north dakota snowmobile trail is not an enticing idea. While healthcare coverage rates are lower than the north dakota snowmobile trail of reported poor physical health days. North Dakota Real Estate is very inexpensive. A single-family home is going to run you between $130,000 and $200,000 depending on the north dakota snowmobile trail, would led to serious fights between the north dakota snowmobile trail when accepted in the north dakota snowmobile trail, they had the north dakota snowmobile trail of purchase shall receive compound annual protection. Those at age 61 but below 76 years of wind, rain, and the north dakota snowmobile trail of shelling out more than 36 million acres. The CRP land has literally turned the north dakota snowmobile trail be updated. This is a good time. Some of this people are single and are ready to meet with a nice single person. Go anywhere in the north dakota snowmobile trail, covering Minnesota.
Group Problem Solving Requires Every Individual to (A) agree on the SOURCE of the problem; (B) have the will, or be willing to agree to mutual coercion at times when they are struggling; to ACT to eliminate the source of the problem.
Phoenix carried the Indiana bullwhip mighty well in the opening action scenes. I think The Last Crusade has consistently the best and most amusig action scenes of the series. They arespaced out by good storytelling unlike being padded with the gross out elements of Temple of doom.
I really hate our armor this expansion. As I said, if I had known shaman armor was all about animal skulls, chains and other creepy things, I might have reconsidered! Rhia is completely NOT into that kind of thing, you know.
2. Provide a weekend holiday or trip abroad with family annually for top performers. The fact that you include their family will bring them closer to your company and increase their organisational commitment.
Of course Yuno’s fixation with Yukiteru shouldn’t gel with the stated goal of the survival game – one of them MUST die for the game to end, and with Deus’ slow degradation (his motive for starting the game anyway, to prevent the world’s end) there can’t be a stalemate. Yuno decides that she will do her best to protect Yukiteru until the end, so that he can become god – the combined power of his and her diaries means that nothing can happen to Yukiteru that they can’t foresee. And this is shown in the very first episode, where together they take down Third who is also a notorious serial killer in the area and also their high-school teacher!
Hugs & Kisses
A few months after having my child, my vision failed to return to full capacity. I wasn’t very concerned, but my family was. They encouraged me to have my vision checked. I finally caved in, but sine I never wore glasses before, I still wasn’t too concerned. I was dumbfounded when I did the initial eye test. Right away, it was obvious I had no central line of vision in one eye. The optometrist referred me to a ophthalmologist. There the ophthalmologist then referred me to a retinal specialist.
To Your Success!
· Take a walk on a windy day. Fall is a great time of year to do this. We once took a walk on a windy fall day and it was “snowing” leaves the whole time. It was so beautiful with all the leaves gently falling all around us. At first we just watched them and then we all started to jump around to try to catch them.
flown in from India
OK . . . are ya ready? This month's color theme is . . . ta-daaaa . . .
ALMOST All the girls were able to attend! We all had so much fun, laughing and getting to know one another better! It was such a treat to host these women! The owner of the gym is standing to my left. The one with the long brown hair and beautiful smile :)
Engineers: Julia Carney & Mike Robinson
Have you ever received a really cute invitation announcing a birth, a wedding, birthday party...etc...and said WOW that is so cute. Where did they have this made? Well, I will tell you....they got it from my sweet BFF Tammy over at Show and Tell Designs.
She giggled that I used effin. Mainly because she knows exactly what I’m NOT saying.
and that is the risk of doing
* Main recipes: Helm, Chest, Wrist, Glove, Belt, Leg and Feet slot armor (medium and heavy) for non-force users.
After the AGM is over, a free lunch was provided, including a vegetarian option (for all those vegetarian arms dealers).
(Mother motions to the servants, but they hesitate to leave Anwaar.)
And please please next put a flyer in my newpaper slot. They never make it into my house. They are either blown away or immediately recycled.
Laurelwood Public House & Brewery
but the stamp is part of the Holly Hill range. I just so happened to have put this stamp,
Carefully remove the ramekins from the water bath, cool to room temperature and refrigerate for at least two hours.
Why can’t you see throu—never mind
The Last Ringbearer is a curious piece of work. At least in this translation, it’s an often prosaic adventure story, reminiscent of the most ordinary work of Isaac Asimov, who was capable of rendering interesting ideas in pedestrian ways. As a re-envisioning of one of the persistent motifs of Tolkien’s trilogy, the clash between spirit and flesh, between the soul and the brain, Yeskov’s novel is rather one-dimensional.
Some things truly are sweeter the second time around...I picked up this book a few years back and enjoyed every word. Recently, I was going through my stash of books and magazines in preparation for a book fair fundraising event and I found my copy (along with some old Nancy Drew mysteries). I pulled it out for our 17 year-old son, who has been studying teachings on the subject of "tolerance'' (he is getting a lot of practice since he started his first job!). What began as a quick flip through turned into a full re-read and I'm finding it to be just as delicious as I remembered!
These rifles are very rare, very expensive, and very specialized. They are not in common use by any stretch of the imagination; but they are out there.
So, I hemmed and hawed over signing up. Did I want to commit myself? Would I make myself feel guilty if I couldn’t keep up? I have that problem too… an overabundance of guilt seeping from my pores. My online friends encouraged me to sign up and reminded me that once you sign up for it, you have access to that Shimelle’s class forever. So I went out there last week and got myself to the registration page… put in all the information and then at the last minute decided to just shut it down and not complete the financial transaction. We’re running a little tight on finances at the moment, as I said above, I have a few of my furry children who are draining me with vet bills lately, among other pop-up expenses that happened this month. So, I questioned how “late” I could sign up and found out I could sign up all the way until the end of the class. So… I will wait a payday or two and then sign up, even though then I wouldn't be on the same page/prompt as the rest of the majority of the class.
1 1/2 cups of shredded jarlsberg cheese
… They move through the rooms, Robin holding a drink in one hand, her arm draped
“Do you miss me?” I could hear the accusation resonating in my tone. She paused, perhaps aware that I needed her far more than she would ever need me. It wasn’t love, far from it. It was an insidious form of lust. I wanted to possess her, to own her beauty. But it was a game, merely an ill fated distraction, because as soon as she wavered, as soon as she let me in the door, I would lose interest. It was all about the chase, the mystery of not knowing whether I’d captivate her imagination.
This is not a once a year denial, but a lifestyle of putting the flesh in the coffin.
What to do.......................what to do? Of course I love vintage music paper and German scrap. But cut out circles of paper, and post it notes?
“Well, to be honest, it was Jinx I was angry with because he was scratching the wallpaper.” That was another lie, but at it was at least a believable explanation. Jinx was not bothered by these accusations and continued his snooze. Lisa’s father finally realised that she didn’t want to tell him anything.
God is the reality. He changes everything. When we suffer as Christians we cry out to Jesus. He provides for us. He comforts us. Because of Jesus we gain the kingdom of heaven (v3), we inherit the earth (v5), we are shown mercy (v7), we will see God (v8), and be called His children (v9).
Light fixture: $60 ($54 if I didn't break one shade) Lowe's
I shall continue to hope..
I loved the My Mind's Eye Follow Your Heart - Be Happy theme... I used an overlay on the picture.
We all have experienced this at work, a distinct organizational hierarchy, a boss-subordinate distinction and sometimes we’ve even dealt with some power play where bosses, supervisors & managers use the power trump card quite liberally.
I have within the past few months started Swing Dancing, it is almost like a drug. I'm addicted and love it!
Today BF Goodrich continues to expand its tyre range with products for business use and the launch of the Radial Long Trail T/A Tour tyres to strengthen the 4×4 range
Even though I wasn't sure this would break down my mental block, I said yes. After all, who doesn't want to spend time writing with their daughter?
Thank you to everyone that played along with us for our "Halloween" Challenge #65. We had some AMAZING entries. I am always overwhelmed at the amount of talent out there!! Please go to the post below to see who Mr. Random has chosen as our Featured Artist!!
I've been here longer than I made it both those other times combined. And I just got the key to my own place. It's a tiny little apartment, but it's exactly what I need right now. It's a scary (terrifying) new adventure, but I'm feeling more capable than I ever have in my life. I can do this.
“You might want to take along some snacks,” she advised. “Maybe some pretzels.”
As ever, please do NOT post your answers, but do say if you think you have solved the puzzle and how long it took. Solution on Monday.
And I swear to god, if I hear that f***ing song one more time (aka if I get that f***ing song stuck in my head one more time) I’ll definitely be setting fire to something, trust me.
*Hula hoop to 100
The tranny threat. Would you want one of us sitting beside you in an aeroplane? What if that tranny is a terrorist? In Canada,
The DP are from Micheals and they come in the shape of the tag, I free cut the Kraft behind it.
There must be a more realistic way to practice “Paying Attention.” Perhaps, to focus more on what you’re feeling and if you make a judgement fine, but not to dwell on the judgement.
These transplants will be ready to put in the garden in mid to late July. The spring crops will all have been harvested by then so there will be space for the transplants. Some people direct seed these crops in the garden, but I find for many that there isn't time for both a spring and a fall crop if I don't start transplants.
Here are this week's Top 3....
The support contrasts with the stance of major Internet companies against SOPA and PIPA, which sought to allow the government to prevent access to sites hosting illegally published intellectual property.­
So, to be honest, he talked on for four or five minutes about his rationale, while I pretended to listen. The reality is that while he was talking, I was vacantly nodding my head, all the time thinking: “Will I ask him now? Is he going to belt me when I put it to him?”
According to Deirdre McCloskey, this is the key to the wealth of the modern world. That we live in a world in which buying low and selling high is at least tolerated encourages economic growth. The great irony of this is that merchants tend to be scorned or otherwise not trusted. But who is the real public servant: the politician deciding he will take more of your money by force so that he can accomplish his goals, or the merchant who decides he wants more of your money and offers you a hot cup of tasty coffee in return?
For a long time, Matthew was considered the first Gospel written, but the grammar of Mark doesn’t really allow for any option other than its being written first. The reason is the style and grammar of Mark is so bad, it doesn’t make any sense for Mark to have copied so extensively from Matthew only to dumb down the language. Rather, it’s hard to see a method of transmission any different from the one now commonly accepted: “Mark” wrote the first story of Jesus, and “Matthew” and “Luke” (the gospels are actually written anonymously) copied extensively from him while adding their own material – either from each other or a third source (scholars call it “Q”). “John” wrote last, although since his work has almost nothing in common with the others, it’s harder to date. Scholars see it being written closer to the end of the first century, though.
Perhaps where they are struggling the most is Local Government and service delivery. Towns that were once beautiful, clean, well run municipalities, are now in a terrible state. Just drive through places like Mokopane (previously Potgietersrus), Makhado (Louis Trichardt) and even Mthatha to see this deterioration. Corruption, self-interest and greed have unfortunately ensured that the struggle continued since 1994.
Ruined place.
The following morning the school bus arrived very early to take me to the school. It was my first real experience of Cairo traffic and I discovered it was an exciting business.
“We do not ask for much,” Van Cleef continued. “Just enough to feed our families, to take care of our loved ones who saw so little of us while we labored – no, SLAVED away for our dear King and his lords and ladies. If they would just take care of this by paying us the money we deserve-”
- The Joltin’ Jew
7. We both like The Pet Shop Boys
Records, but Dischord hasn't been very active for a long time. You still
Being goal-oriented means you have a focus and outcome in mind. Sometimes in art, that has to be general since we want the over-all outcome to be creative, not totally predicted.
Here is a little celebration of some of the beautiful paintings that sold:
one owl swoops down low over me
~ Meditating on the Inner Marriage, the Christ to the Magdalene, the Divine Masculine to the Divine Feminine, Shiva to Shakti, on this day deepens and expands the depths to which one can experience true Oneness within.
16-18 years old: Pretty much the same, minus the Beanie Babies. And the keepsake box from men who didn’t know me became a keepsake box from my boyfriend at the time. And then I got sentimental, and began grabbing something from each grandparent, something from each parent, something from my brother. I wanted all my bases covered.
February Cleaning Schedule
The features of the mountains were almost relentless; the hills were showing off every shade of green they could as rolling couds casted over their shadows on certain parts of the mountain. The clouds sachéd across the inexplicable blue sky in their whites and charcoals, making the sunshines rays that much more piercing as they fought their way through the looming clouds.
Some of the things she writes about are well known to those of us who have read many spiritual books over time, and they are like a reminder of knowledge already gained. Yet other things were new to me. Tonika has a different view on many historical events as well as on spiritual protection as such in that she writes, there is no such thing as protection from false energies. Tonika writes about discernment, a much needed quality in these times of immense information coming towards us.
- When I am walking through campus alone at night I carry my key so it sticks out between my fingers, That way if attacked I can defend myself.
“No,” we said in hopeful unison. He told us that the bank offers a policy to people like us (on fixed-term positions), and they do not look at pre-existing conditions. It was an amazing stroke of luck that we found out about this, since we were getting very desperate. We found out you had to sign the contract within 2 weeks of arrival, and we had made it just in time.
In the past, advertising was regulated to television and print media. However, with the invention of the internet, there is an entire new sphere with which to consume content and advertise to clients. For business with a website, there are an abundance of advertising and marketing tools at your disposal for generating new business.
I love you but am not in love with you – what the hell does that even mean?
We went to a a local Mexican restaurant. It was really fun. Georgia melts everyone she meets. Mostly because she waves to EVERYONE and they just love it. She was even held by a few strangers and they just ate her up. Of course, being the ham that she is she totally loved every minute of it.
“Leave for me a ONE word comment that best describes me using the THIRD letter of your LAST NAME. It can only be ONE word. Then copy and paste this to your Wall so I can leave a word about you.”
Rinse your pork chops and pat them dry. Sprinkle liberally with the rub and (not surprisingly) rub it into the meat all over. That’s it. They don’t need to sit – it will just suck the moisture out of your pork, so do this right before cooking.
Hope everyone is enjoying their weekend, Bank Holiday tomorrow, but I've got to work. I've managed to find time over the weekend to make another Christmas Card - my collection is growing, at this rate I might have enough ready and wont need to panic make at the last minute. My card has been inspired by the ABC Christmas challenge where the theme is 'icy', the snowflake doily and the ice have been painted with glamour dust glitter paint and they are a lot more sparkly in real life. I decided to stay with the white theme and emboss the greeting with white embossing powder which doesn't really show up in the photograph.
You can garnish with fresh basil, if you desire to. We did.
"I read your blog entry about the pleasures of being single and it really resonated with me. I think it's totally true what you say about it allowing space and time to explore yourself and the world around you. The only thing better than being single, in my opinion, is being with someone who's really a perfect match for you (which is what we're all looking for ultimately, right? at least, most of us are). I feel like my fiancee and i are lucky enough to have that, for which i'm incredibly thankful, but it took a long time to find each other. And I have to say, learning to enjoy the waiting -- and the searching -- made the finally finding each other even sweeter."
I am also trying to put off cleaning my house today. We are having my 97 year old grandmother over today. She is a stubborn Irish women and I feel like I have to make everything perfect so she doesn't go report bad things back to my mother. Last time she was here she complained about my thermostat. Yes of all things, my thermostat. I knew I should have gone to lunch with my Aunt and Cousin, would make my life much easier. But alas, I am being a good Catholic and a good granddaughter.
Wow! I love tea and the teapots I'm seeing! Thanks for the chance to win them. I'm looking forward to Friday night! Last time I got side tracked by uploading cards to SCS while I was waiting and ended up missing the party :-( ! Won't do that again!
One of my nemesis holes at Strathmore is hole # 5, an interesting test of wit and courage. Off the tee box, all you see is trouble down the left side of the fairway. Depending on when you play here, the cattails may either hide some of the water on the left or help you focus on clearing the wetland. A straight drive along the water’s edge is trouble. If you follow that line, you’re asking for it. There’s no real advantage for staying close to the water, other than shorten your approach into the green. I would rather be safe and aim for the middle of the fairway and have a mid iron to the green.
Rhonda Schrock lives in Northern Indiana with her husband and 4 sons, ages 22, 18, 13, and 5. By day, she is a telecommuting medical transcriptionist. In the early morning hours, she flees to a local coffee shop where she pens “Grounds for Insanity,” a weekly column that appears in The Goshen News. She is an occasional guest columnist in The Hutch News. She’s also blogged professionally for her son’s school of choice, Bethel College, in addition to humor and parenting blogs, and maintains her personal blog, “The Natives are Getting Restless.” She is a writer and editor for the magazine, "Cooking & Such: Adventures in Plain Living." She survives and thrives on prayer, mochas, and books.
I was much more pleased with this dress than I’d expected to be. The fabric was extremely soft, drapey, and comfortable. In fact, once I ran my hand over it I was pretty sure it was not cotton at all. In fact this one is mislabeled on the site, the tag revealed it to be “100% Viscose.”
Pink Striped DP from Itsy Bitsy....
2. Triage every single day. Be proactive and imagine the worst possible things that could go wrong. Then specifically address those things first to keep them from happening. In medicine this often means identifying the sickest patients and keeping a close watch on them.
Perhaps it is this dogged determination which he says is part of his personality that has kept him doing what he has all this time.
1/8 tsp. onion powder
and i pray continually for the people that do. i pray continually for our world.
By acting like a dog while making his dumb thug life relevant
It sounds so simple when said or written for a show’s script, but this happens to be a very difficult lesson for me to learn. It’s like having a turtlehead trying to think and write about it. I am now, highly aware that I become very indecisive when I take people into consideration…Should I meet for dinner later so I can go to yoga? Would he be mad? Should I ask for a ride home? Would she be annoyed that it’s 10 minutes out of her way? Shouldn’t I be saving my money? But I really want to get there in time to spend as much time with my buddies?
1941.
Last night I saw a meteor and today I saw a flying fish
An awkward silence hung in the air
Now some people want to go a step further. In Wikipedia they’re called “registered users,” and it’s free, it’s easy. Again, no one will check whether or not you’re the right kind of person. Want to step up? Step up.
what you need to fix this, the answers lie in your heart. I’m sorry, Psyche… I love you,” and with that, she was gone. After all this time, she only stayed with me for a few seconds. I wanted so much more, I needed so much more. Just one more hug, just one more moment. I still missed her every day as I pushed through the heartache and fumbled through my routine.
Occupation: Teenage troublemaker; held various jobs as a teen (e.g., worked at a car garage and pet store). He became a building contractor as an adult.
officials signing this letter. In addition, there should be a public hearing and
I learnt how to use my camera, which I had had for two years and never moved the dial from auto. I learnt how to use light and depth of field to give different effects and create different moods in a photo.
Every afternoon/evening before our class the PR professor who inhabited our classroom before us would probe anyone in the room about what class we were kicking him out for. (Every week he’d ask what the class was, I am worried about his short term memory and during the last class I plan on bringing him some Vitamin B and a DS with the game Brain Age already inserted.) When I or someone else would tell him it was game studies he would inquire, slightly judgmentally, ” What are you learning?”
This demonstrates that, even when the whole campaign and even – as is asserted to be the case here – the whole nation depends on preserving the lives of a few men, the "system" failed to step up to the plate. And if it could do it then, it most certainly could do it in the context of operations where the survival of the nation was not at stake.
- Yellow
a. When the customer is known but the task is not
I got bored pretty quickly (in the first section of the game, the apartments) and I stopped playing AGAIN. I sat down and played Silent Hill 3 before actually playing Silent Hill 2. Worked pretty well since they're non-canon anyway.
But...are we doomed to ridicule because of the number issue? Is Andy right when he poses the setpiece question, "Is 4.5 ABV session worthy or must it be 3.5 or lower? Often obsessed with the numbers, the side of session beer that promotes balance and flavor harmony is lost in the process. Belaboring such beer minutiae escapes or disinterests most drinkers."
On to sewing. Here is the last project for 2011. Top from B5355, the skirt is V8464. The print fabric came from the Chicago Textile Outlet as I helped my daughter use her Groupon, LOL The skirt fabric was leftover from a long time ago. It's funny I can remember this. But we purchased several pieces of textured crepe before it was called Fabric.com. It worked well for jackets, skirts and slacks. I lined the skirt although the pattern doesn't call for it. It's a straight skirt with darts on the front & back. It has a centered back zipper and narrow waistband. I like this skirt and have made it twice so far. The pattern I've had for over a year perhaps. And the top is a loose-fitting pullover and sash with full-length raglan sleeves. The neckline has bias tape that I made from the fabric. I wore this on New Year's Day. It was comfortable to wear but I think I will most likely shorten the sleeves just a bit.
future fine artists and the schools they attend with scholarship money,
However, Zhivago struggles to maintain his individuality at a time when individuals are regarded as canon-fodder to be sacrificed by Czarist Russia in its war against Germany while those who survive find themselves thrust into a fledgling society ruled by the Bolsheviks who regard concepts such as individualism as outdated and dangerous.
The nurse opens the door of a large refrigerator. “We’re plum out, ma’am. But we do have something from downtown.”
So they cried aloud, and cut themselves, as was their custom, with knives and lances, until the blood gushed out on them. And when midday was past, they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice. But there was no voice; no one answered, no one paid attention.
Originally presented in Chaosium Digest Volume 31, Number 2, Tuesday, May 2, 2000
Maybe that means getting a diet food delivery service to deliver healthy meals for you.
ZTUBH Blog (ztubhblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
So far, I've come up with POV switches, sticking to a linear chronological structure, not switching tenses or between first and third person, prologues and a few others.
It can start off with a simple warning, such as when TheRat (my sister) advised me to “never, under any circumstances, should you ever consider watching ‘Two Girls One Cup.’ I swear, I was going to blow chunks. I couldn’t make it all the way through.”
Megalomania is possibly more common than we think or admit – just that most of us do not have the resources or public acceptability to go about it. In the past, building statues and other structures to oneself, has often been practiced by the rulers in India. The kings of India have done this – Britishers have gone on to name entire cities and islands after living monarchs and other white men. As it turns out, Shravan Prajapati, the sculptor of the statues also has sculpted a commissioned statue of Margaret Thatcher, very alive and kicking.
This morning I stepped on my bathroom scale and it said 197. That makes me super duper happy. The last time I stepped on a scale and it was below 200 was 7 years ago. I remember it like it was yesterday. I was working at the animal hospital and we had just gotten in a new animal scale. I got on there and it said 191. I thought that was horrible. I was embarrassed to tell anyone. Today I am just considered over weight. The word obese is just a nasty word. Nobody wants to be called obese. Sure, I haven’t been no where near to skinny ever, but I never was overly overweight. After two kids and never getting active, it came like a lightning flash; or so it seemed.
Sarkozy is in trouble, and if he loses it will seen a ripple right across the EU which could have a significant effect, austerity is being rejected by the people.
But that was not all. Oh no.
I am doing the project for my SU group's monthly meeting. Since Halloween is just around the corner, I thought....why not do a Halloween treat holder. I've had these little metal tins forever and I designed this little holder to carry two of them. The dimensions of the carrier is:
I'm having fun with my newest sets of Spellbinders Nestabilities. This one is called FLeur de Lis Rectangles. I inked an embossed card front for the background, added some teal webbing, popped my pinwheel onto the side, with the metal charm letters spelling out DREAM, and attached my image to the card to finish it off. If you look close you can see a little printing on the paint chip; that identifies the color. I kind of like the fact that it shows up!!
The weather here in CNY has been fabulous! I can not remember when we had a March like this.
Question?
Later, Mary and Marshall share a moment on the roof. And it’s quite possibly the best happy moment of this episode. Marshall reiterates that Mary’s dad was able to protect her, even in that one moment.
Now, I don't know much about clothes, but it looks to me like the man knows what he is doing. I also don't know much about models, but I do know if some of them lean any further back while walking down the catwalk, they are going to be flat on their backs - stillettoes to the wind. Some of the girls loped down the runway as if they were engaged in a permanent game of limbo. What's with that?
It was a rather grey day with the first heavy snowfall of the season forecast for later on. I arrived at the hospital by bus and planned to return home using the same method of transport. At no point did I fret over the operation. In fact, I still recalled my GP's words when she first saw me last summer and the phrase "laser the sty off" kept coming back. So, I carried on thinking that the procedure would be quick and painless. A radio with the station Magic FM was on with Queen's We are the champions playing to the whole ward. The signs couldn't have been more encouraging.
Eurydice crumpling round each next
2 tablespoons of starter from your vat in the fridge
Lady Hero is a 24 year old aristocrat who has been trained from a young age to be a Duke’s dutiful daughter. She knows all the rules of society and decorum. Her brother has arranged a marriage for her to the respected and handsome Marquis of Mandeville. It is a good match even if there has been no affection or passion exchanged between them.
Off topic . . . here is where our "World Class Neighbors" park their car. It hasn't moved in weeks. When I asked them to move it they said they will not. Her defense is "a lot of cars park in front of mailboxes. Why are we being targeted?" Like I said, they are "World Class"!
Down we went into the canyon of Eldorado Creek. I felt pretty good during this section but it was hot, hot, hot. The climb up out of the canyon to Michigan Bluff was a pain in the butt but I made it to see my crew of Erin, Ed and Gary once again. 55 miles done and I was cooked too. 13.5 hours in---6:30 in the evening and it was still warm out. The aid station workers were worried about me. I was exhausted. I gained weight---I believe I was up 3 pounds they said. I told them I just needed some salt and I would be fine. They were also worried about my sunburn. I wasn't worried about it as much as I was worried about time. I wanted to be in Foresthill at this time but I was still 7 miles from there. The crew pieced me back together getting much needed salt down and I was off to Foresthill where I would meet up with Danny to pace me. I needed that boost and it was coming soon.
It hurts to hold this rope.
and the ghosts of such burn.
One good thing is that I was at my summer cabin the whole time, so a barely showered all weekend (because we are on an island surrounded by the lake). There really is no reason to shower every day while your out there, and we don’t actually have a shower on the island, so in order to shower you have to go to the mainland. So, in reality, the water that I saved not showering probably far surpassed any damage I did not having my bottle.
to the paper with hot glue.
I wrote this poem while on the phone. My refrigerator is adorned with magnetic poetry, and in minutes, I can write a brand new poem just by glancing over the words. At times that poor fridge has been covered with poems, the most being six. It has provided a space to write as I’ve been going through my rough break up, as I rediscover myself and start over on my own. Usually fridges are for food and drinks, but for me it supplies another need: my need to create poetry. It is because of those fulfilled needs that I thank it everyday. It may not be a human; it may not be able to produce hugs or kisses or even be a best friend, but it gives me the ability to create the one main thing that keeps me going: words, in between which I can provide my own words, add in some thought and create another beautiful masterpiece. What a magificent blessing!
I'm down to needing 7 cards now to finish that set (hence the silver 7 reference). They are #'s 100, 136, 138, 225, 257, 291 & 349.
Jeremy moved to the next Hagglesmith, having freed and wakened Jorus, and began to untie Brox, who was also unconscious. While he did this Johan noticed that dust had begun to cover the crates, and shelves of all the wine racks in the room. He also noticed that there was a subtle blue tinge coming through the doorway where the secret door was still open, though he could see no light in the corridor beyond. It almost seemed to him that there was something oddly curved about the doorway. He couldn’t really tell what it was that made him think so, but it gave him a queasy feeling to look at it. Lying on the floor across the open secret doorway was Allen Wainsilver, still unconscious. He seemed lit by the mysterious blue light.
The Red Sox are in last place and without Crawford, Youkilis and Bailey, this calls for some drastic change. WIth Crawford being out and with his contract he signed which is 160 million/8 years. Maybe the Red Sox should re-oped his contract because he is not up to his requirements to the franchise and have that extra money for the trade mark in the middle of the season. That is just my opinion.
were little boats
30.- Mother to have the daily effort of pleasing God in the performance of every duty, small and great.
As a reviewer for SFFWorld and maybe because of this blog, I receive a lot of books for review from various publishers. Since I can't possibly read everything that arrives, I figure the least I can do (like some of my fellow bloggers) is mention the books I receive for review on the blog to at least acknowledge the books even if I don't read them.
Join us at the corner of Sterling Place and Nostrand Avenue Saturday to “Beautify and Unify” Crown Heights North
Hi everyone! I hope you all had a nice Thanksgiving! Today I wanted to share with you a great idea I had for a ruffle (or more accurately - a gathered) headband. It's very simple and a it would make a great stocking stuffer or gift for a friend in the office.
But, if you want to write, then you have to write and there is no real advice except possibly to read lots of well-written books – because reading badly-written books will only lead you on to writing badly-written books.
You are called upon, at a school, to tell those interested in becoming an author, all the ins and outs of good writing skills and getting published. What are the three important elements in writing, publishing and promoting that you would give them?
What a beautiful city we live in!
Finally, despite Radcliffe's pluck and elfin charm, I kept missing the puckish comedy of Robert Morse, the silly imperiousness of Rudy Vallee, and the jazz inflections of Michele Lee's voice.
Some of my readers may already know that I’m also a Scentsy consultant. While I’ll get into that in another blog post someday, I’ll be attending the Scentsy convention in Las Vegas later this summer. In late Summer/early Fall, I’ll be attending the last of my intensive courses. I’m going to my first henna intensive to learn even more about the art. I’ve always loved hosting henna parties and holding Henna Nights at my old studio, so I’m happy to improve my skills in the henna part of my business. I’ll learn more about the traditions and cultures behind designs, improving my recipe, and learning so much I can’t even begin to describe it!
Besides Ng, five other men have come forward to accuse Yap of using the same trick to trick them into stripping naked unsuspectingly in front of a webcam. Yap would strip herself first to seduce the men into doing so and then used the footage to extort them into paying her.
The background paper is from Lori's Garden (Pg. 43). The frame is from the Elegant Edges cartridge (Pg. 29). I cut three layers: oblong frame, frame base, and shadow. The frames are filled with papers from Lori's garden; the frame in a solid light brown, the base in a yellow pattern (Pg. 44) and the shadow in a solid blue. The edges are inked with Versa Magic Chalk Ink.
We think the British people, including those in Northern Ireland , are entitled to know this and to be very angry indeed.
All we can do, ultimately, is hold them close in our heart.
Mitra Building, 4th Floor, Jl. Jend. Gatot Subroto Kav. 21 Jakarta 129310
Legend has it this dish was a favorite of Queen Bona Sforza, an Italian princess who married Polish King Sigismund I in the 16th century. Homesick for her native Italy where cucumbers were common, everytime she ate it, it made her cry. Hence the Polish word for "misery," derived from the Latin.
Phorpa is far from typical Hollywood fare, relying on its unusual, yet delightful story to catch the attention of its viewers. Interesting questions are raised over the course of the film.
RBI Leaders: Ron Santo 114
Like a Hurricane
It actually is older than soldier son and he is 32.
CO-01 Diana DeGette OK-04 Tom Cole
6 Tb canola oil
Jeanne loved the fact that single ladies could come alone and return home with dozens of new friends, all the while feeling the unconditional love that only her Quackers could understand and provide. No judgments and no
All my old friends are now grown up, some married off, some gone right, some gone astray.
by and following. I am one lucky lady!
Little Fockers Set Visit
Hope he’ll like it! ♥ Then it’s just one day left, then the weekend comes, And we will all be some busy, busy bees! Looking forward to it all!
This product was provided for review by the Amazon Vine Program.
Good luck and thanks for participating. This is all a big experiment for me, so I apologize for any kinks in the process. I hope you guys have fun flexing your writing muscles and I can’t wait to read all of the submissions!
In light of this reality ask yourself the following questions:
Although I struggled with the Spanish phrases (needing to consult an online translator to aid my basic, patchy Spanish), its use was very effective and adds flavour to the characters and to the overall plot. I found that and the touch of Mexican culture unique and very enlightening. Not to mention the sense of brotherhood, loyalty, danger, and most of all the sense of self present in Perfect Chemistry very gripping.
I’ve spent mine praying.
But the Lords crucially amended this bit of the Bill, enabling functions to be transferred to any ‘permitted authority’, provided the transfer “would promote economic development … or increase local accountability”. The mayoral bribe had gone – replaced only by a thinly disguised code.
Are we not creating a double edged sword when we allow Jon Montgomery to swill most of a pitcher of beer on camera after winning the men's skeleton and for some reason, no one complained then. Is it then because the team in question are women?
I have MANY such examples of hacking together ‘good enough’ solutions, but where am I going with all of this? In just 6 weeks, I’ve made LOTS of mistakes, run into LOTS of hiccups, and overcome them with LOTS of makeshift solutions. For a girl who used to strive for 100% on her math tests, shooting for 80% is a new concept, and I’m really enjoying it! I’m not saying that we should be lazy and build crappy products for our customers. All I’m saying is that by being extremely customer-focused, I can solve the customer’s problem by only spending 20% of my time and resources. It frees up time for learning Spanish, reading The Power of Less, practicing guitar chords, basking in the sun, latino romances, or heck, even working on idea extraction for my NEXT product.
The source added that MAS, which was in dire need for fresh capital, would also make a rights issue very soon.
Citadines hotel animal fee: $174
According to Wright, he also received a short lecture from Obama on the necessity of sometimes stretching the truth.
15. Follow Your Dreams feat. Adanita Ross
"No," I insisted, "I have to push now. Like really, really have to push. Like, I have this crazy huge urge to push and I just have to do it. Would you mind getting the doctor right away?"
A few weeks ago, Karen wrote this blog post highlighting the benefits of sharing large fabric orders with friends and therefore saving money. I commented, saying that I'd had my eye on some luscious polka dot lining fabric for a while, and wouldn't it be handy if a few more sewists were up for buying some too?! Within minutes, yes minutes, a flurry of bloggers had responded wanting to join in and the Polka Dot Lining Syndicate was born!
Instant feedback and measurable results.
Cover and bake in the preheated oven for about 2 1/2 to 3 hours, or until meat is tender enough to fall apart.
In the meantime Police Commissioner Dwayne Glibbs insisting that the officers were “Peace Officers” and the raid was legal. Was this the only way to conduct that investigation?
while trying to forget I remembered you
The amount of movement involved depends on the production requirements. News stories tend to be quite static, concentrating on what the guest has to say and minimising distractions. Programmes which are more entertainment-focused may include a lot more variety, with the camera operator moving around and showing different angles of the guest, presenter and surroundings.
It only avers that she has a right to redeem the property and that she is entitled to the reliefs prayed for, such as the issuance of a permanent injunction. Furthermore, the complaint states a sufficient cause of action which is set out in its paragraph 4 to 6, inclusive, that is, the right to redeem the property and to prevent the defendant-spouses Apolinario Melo and Lilia T. Melo and defendant Julio Barreto to consolidate their ownership over the property.
This is definitely a vein of questions that will determine how sports will be played/expressed in an a New System of Equality.
As all good inspectors do, he sought out his crime maps for the intelligence analyst and looked at his monthly, six-monthly and annual crime, broken down by crime type: robbery, burglary, vehicle crime, violent crime, anti-social behaviour, etc., etc.. Several things stood out but on the matter of violent crime, one thing stood out in particular. A specialist psychiatric facility for women and children. Very, very high levels of reported violent crime.
These sisters act as one “face” of the Catholic Church (and Jesus Christ) to the American public. They have a sacred duty to uphold the teachings of the Catholic Church, yet many of them have been failing miserably in that regard, for many, many years.
Director : Brett Levner
Addicts like to rationalize.
Here’s where things get really ugly. TPMDC’s Brian Beutler calls “the” $2.5-trillion cost estimate a “doozy” of a “hysterical Republican whopper.” Not only is he incorrect, he doesn’t seem to realize that Gregg and I are correcting for different budget gimmicks; it’s just a coincidence that we happened to reach the same number.
Cause and effect are blurred, to a degree, so that it's no longer possible to think of one scene leading into the next, and the lack of clear indicators of time and place means that the order in which things occur is frequently unclear except when the dialogue drops enough contextual clues to figure it out. But if time travel makes Claude's life a puzzle, it's obvious that Resnais doesn't mean for the audience to reassemble the pieces: there are too many pieces missing, too many that don't fit, too many gaps. There is a genuine mystery here, some uncertainty revolving around how exactly Catrine died, but the mystery is not the point: the core of the film is the emotional intensity of re-examining one's life, rifling through the archives of memory and finding all these moments and images that evoke nostalgia, or regret, or happiness, or despair. The way things fit together in the end hardly matters; Claude already knows how things end, even if the audience doesn't quite yet, and his experience of his life as an out-of-order flow of scenes both banal and earth-shaking is what the film is all about.
Well, she didn't put it quite like that...
Cashier: That's good. It's not nice to fight with your friends.
Women have done so on this special date for centuries. Could 2012 be your turn?
Amanda wrote:
that the two
11 Wet, Weird & Smeared 10:14
Bellamy was wheeled on for the last ten minute to give Everton something to think about, if nothing else his pace would test tiring legs? He was at it straight away putting Osman under pressure and causing him to concede a corner. Although this came to nothing it eventually ended up with Coleman upending Gerrard on the left. Bellamy swung the free kick in and Carroll, rising to knock it in with the back of his head and score his second last gasp winner in a week, proved that perseverance has it’s own rewards.
I think a good marriage should have lots of passion (not just sex, although more is always good). Being that we are completely opposite, it is hard really hard to share the same passions. We try to show each other that we care about what the other person really likes in life but that is not easy. She loves to write, read, listen to loud music, sing, throw parties and the like. I love to hunt and fish. I listen to music but I am not stirred by it the way she is. I know she wishes that were different. I know other people probably wished that I was different, that I was more like them, and this would make them want me around more and be able to talk to me and accept me because I would be more like the rest of the family. I can't help that fact. God has just given me a passion for the outdoors.
Once everything was completely dry, I packaged them in individual cellophane bags, tied with raffia and a custom favor tag. I hope everyone at the baby shower enjoyed them! Stay tuned for the cake and cupcakes that went along with these cookies!
Then on Sunday morning I went to a local playing field to watch the Anjali House team play in the finals of the 15 and under league of local kids. There is an organisation here and elsewhere called Globalteer that places volunteers in NGO's like Anjali, and also supports local initiatives. Several years ago, one Australian with a big heart decided the local kids needed a way to play on real teams and in a competitive (though not too competitive) environment. Globalteer has been funding the program for the past few years, which means hiring the field, paying for strips if the kids need it, buying the trophies and ribbons etc. Standing out in an open field watching the kids play in over 40 degrees C was pretty exhausting. Actually playing the game was mind-boggling. But the kids are great. And they play barefoot on dirt. Many of the teams have soccer boots for the kids, but not all, so no one wears them. Again, I don't know how they do it. The Anjali team lost but, as they say, a good time was had by all. And note the Khmer version of the hot dog stand......
"The Old Man Down the Road" by John Fogerty
NUCLEAR ENERGY IN JAPAN - UPDATE MAY 4, 2012
I believe in What if; in a scrappy pitching staff and a bunch of no names being in first place in the Central. I believe in the Cleveland Indians.
All the other motifs will be added as you go to this and others...
Anyone else have the writer mood swings?
Help me reach my $10.000 target by donating to my online fundraising page:
So I headed onto Upper Frog Street, past the Tenby Rugby Club which does serve non-members, and found the 'Normandie'.
Of course, this has nothing whatsoever to do with the fact that I'm going up to Bristol today to present the prize at the Short Story Prize there. Actually, it really hasn't. I've read most of the stories that will be appearing in the anthology now. And I can tell you that they are absolutely sensational. It's going to be a real honour to meet everyone, and to get to talk to the writers.
The above is not really much of a story, but I do expect the British police to intervene when lone females are being obviously assaulted by multiple males, whilst I do not expect them to behave like the Columbian drug squad when making a straightforward arrest. Both examples are symptomatic of the modern British police “service”.
But when it comes to the tougher stuff like negative experiences involving family or romantic relationships, different versions of history often clash and an underlying truth that ties you to these people can be hard for all parties to swallow. Some folks can clearly see, feel and remember their pain from loss, betrayal, secrets, abuse or whatever, while others may have decided that part of the shared history no longer exists.
That one's for my Rose!
At this point in our lives, who really wants to pay $700 for a seven-day, yearly subscription to a print newspaper when there are so many other options and platforms out there?
Good luck movin' up cause I'm
REASON FOR DEMANDING RECALL OF ED POWERS, CAMMANN ROAD DISTRICT COMMISSIONER, AS PROVIDED ON RECALL PETITION:
As a manager of one of Intute’s ‘Hubs’, one of several things that concerned me at the time was the cost of cataloguing Internet resources. I believe this was eventually calculated to be something like (including overheads, etc) £80 per record*.
"Do you do this Greenie? Do you?"
*Chicken fries: chicken nuggets in the shape of French fries, popularized by the fast-food chains Burger King and KFC. These may also be referred to as chicken sticks.
Dr. North is a magician on the grill
This last month has been so fun! You got to have a lot more firsts: your first Mariner's game, your first bath in the tub, your first visit to the pumpkin patch, your first heart-melting smiles at mom, your first girls' week, and so much more!
Balvenie Signature 12yr – 40%
Aileen and Kyle, thanks for visiting and tolerating the heat. I am excited to share these with you and will be done with the rest of your photos in a few weeks, in the mean time enjoy your new little bundle. She is beyond precious!
Entry Written on 4/22/2012 and 4/24/2012.
And Jean Dujardin is remarkably sexy... which doesn't hurt either.
Gregory: you are dug in on your policies - how
Sobe - Genre (applied to inner lower lash line with MAC 266)
I'm not entirely sure where the week is going, but I suppose its faster when your time is spent snuggling down with a small Pickle Missy, administering cough medicine that doesn't take away coughs.
“Think harder, then. I know I could have made more of a difference in protect my fa- my people had I bothered to learn the art of the sword before the Orcs attacked. And I know that if I had learned to use the Light for healing before they came instead of just reading about it, I could have helped more as well. And I know that our mages were helpful both in and out of battle; with their offensive spells, defensive shields. The food they conjured, the portals they set up. I am sure that you could have the potential to be that useful too.”
I rarely venture into the world of cognac or brandy, other than a little Presidente Mexican Brandy floated on top of my margarita on occasion.
Athena UL is designed to build strong cash values which can allow owners to skip or reduce a premium payment based on their circumstances or roll the cash value into a new product if needs change at a later date. O’Leary said the product has been well received, with good support from BGAs.
reach levels of addiction here.
Barrin – “If you work with me long enough you’ll be free.”
Oh, just tie my hands.
14 year old Ty witnesses an incident of knife crime and gives police evidence, doing what he believes is the right thing. As a result, he and his mum are forced into the witness protection programme and are given new identities and Ty becomes Joe. As Joe’s life spirals out of control he attempts to cling to some semblance of normality and his own identity, all while events and his own decisions seem to do nothing more than lead him further down a path of destruction.
Oh, Father - if for just one moment those who march under the banner of choice could see what they're choosing. Oh God - let us understand your love - it's Your love that makes each life precious, and human life worthy of our nurturing protection.
There’s no doubt in the fact that both of them are great leaders. But who is a better captain depends upon what parameters one uses to judge a captain. If one thinks a captain is judged by the number of wins, then Dhoni is undoubtedly the winner. But if a captain is judged by the the decisions he takes on and off the field, then there’s no one near Dada.
However, The Star, The NST and even The Sun don’t seem to have ever heard of the man. No reports from any of them about what Ramlang Porigi said on Sunday in Permatang Pauh.
Unfortunately, even though she has officially filed to run for the Green Party nomination, and actually won 29% of the vote in a recent Green Party on-line poll, Rosie recently stated on her Twitter account that she will probably support Jill Stein, who got well over 60% in the poll and will probably be this year's Green Party nominee. However, she is running mainly to help promote and build the party.
The bakery itself is small and cute, and it can get crowded really fast, so I left as soon as I got the cupcake. And the box. And the paper bag. This ''photoshoot'' took place at a McDonald's restaurant. I ate lunch there every day, so I could save some money to spend on sweets. So healthy! I need to stop doing that.
I wish for those nights that were so great you wished they would never end.
* my choose joy canvas - because I would need to remember to do that
"A strong library service, based around the needs of local people, can play a key role in our ambitions to build the Big Society by providing safe and inclusive spaces for people to read, learn and access a range of community services," Mr Vaizey said.
Very good beer. I wish there were less of a vinous/fermented fruit taste, but all in all it's one of the best impy stouts I've had.
So here we go with Squid3 configured as transparent proxy. What that means? Provided that the standard HTTP port 80 is redirected to the proxy port and the proxy is configured as transparent the client browsers do not require any specific proxy settings. In fact they do not even notice that they are going through a proxy, I guess. At least the user doesn’t.
‘Winnie the SHIT.’
We've had sunshine with showers, I got laundry dry in between them ;) sunshine with hail, with stunning rainbows & sunshine in a cloud free sky. No more swallows to be seen, it's still Baltic! Where do they go while they wait?
So guess what? Target weight 9st 2lb. Today.............9st 4lb. Worth every ounce though.
1 1/3 cups (266 g) sugar
Christina was beautiful and fair; half Caucasian half Mexican with a lot more Spanish blood than Indian. At 16 she ran away from the controlling and prison-like existence her father had imposed upon her. Because her mother had died when she was only seven, and her father had disowned her upon learning of her pregnancy, she had called me, a friend of the family, for support. I went through the pregnancy with her and was at her side for Ally’s birth. When the nurse handed the little whimpering bundle to me, I knew that God was handing her to me. Her tiny brow was furrowed and I gently rubbed her forehead until she relaxed. God was telling me to protect her, to take care of her, and to be there for her. I softly told her that everything was going to be okay, and that I would take care of her. Her father chose not to take responsibility and she had no grandmother so I, having no children of my own, at age 45, asked Christina if I could be Ally’s “grandma”. Christina welcomed the help and the free babysitting.
We had a staff meeting at our school recently and our union representatives told us how our school district tried to slip Value-Added Measurement of teachers into the negotiations of our new contract. I have written time and time again about the lack of validity of VAM, but that is not stopping local school boards and districts from trying to assess teachers based on student test scores.
I have learnt so much from Dick Lucas’ preaching: not from his teaching about preaching but from him doing it! His style is quite unique, with a delightful self-deprecating and dry sense of humour. But mainly – and this surely is the best test of preaching – there are so many passages (mainly from Mark’s Gospel) where I cannot read them without hearing Dick’s voice in my head. He regularly taught me things which I had not known before, and once I had learnt them I could never forgot the lessons.
"Do you want any peanuts or crisps mate?"
prepare ye the way of the Lord.
Luak said that the government agency (Land and Survey Department) deliberately overlooked the need to inform the people of the survey exercise.
It just seems every place I go they have decorations up..
Though, we shouldn’t look to others to determine what to do next, we might take solace in knowing we are not alone and though we might not be as unique as we think, at least we have the support of others who we share our experiences with.
Fast Times at Ridgemont High starred:
If you don't have a brush then you could just use your fingers..
cut off like a branch from a tree—
Jack's obsession right now (and when I say obsession with Jack-I do mean obsession) is Legos. I love it because it is the first toy or activity that has been able to fully capture Jack's attention. He has never been one to play by himself contentedly-until now. And he is a master at coming up with cool creations (and leaving them all over the house and underfoot). :)
While the matter of dress codes can be approached in a variety of ways, I will approach it from an aesthetic standpoint. This will not be in terms of the beauty of the clothing but rather looking it the matter within the context of the branch of philosophy relating to art and beauty.
Final Volume: 5 gallons
Its was just 30 Sec…….Yes 30 Second……
The trouble is, I decided that I would really like to try and plot this story. I figured I’d take control, avoid the endless rewrites, and condense the whole process. But I’m not by nature a plotter – I am a complete “pantster” – I write on the fly – I have nothing but the barest hint of what is about to happen and I don’t know where the story will go. I have a concept and I have a character and I go from there, to who knows where, on a huge adventure with my characters. You might say the story happens to me as much as it does to my characters.
Shoes: Payless
7. Where do the things I own come from? Do I worry about getting more?
double up the tracks, add .01 sec delay to one of the channels, split channels and mix either side (balance achieved through trial and error)
FALLING SKIES is executive-produced by Steven Spielberg, along with DreamWorks Television heads Justin Falvey and Darryl Frank, Graham Yost (Justified, The Pacific) and screenwriter Robert Rodat. Rodat, who earned an Oscar® nomination for his screenplay for Saving Private Ryan, wrote the pilot from an idea he co-conceived with Spielberg. Mark Verheiden (Heroes, Battlestar Galactica) and Greg Beeman (Heroes, Smallville) are co-executive producers. The pilot was directed by Carl Franklin (One False Move, Out of Time).
The first day we got to Orlando, we took J to Downtown Disney. She loved running around everywhere. Her favorite thing to do was run around the brick planters. She had to walk on every one we came too. Then she found a small circular one and we were stuck for quite some time, in the rain nonetheless, while she went round and round. We took her to eat a the Rainforest Cafe. She was not very impressed. There are thunderstorms that occur about every half hour, and I thought that they would scare her. But J did not bat an eye.
He knew, as we all should, that suffering precludes glory as we see in Romans 8:17. “If so be that we suffer with him, that we may be also glorified together.” We see the similarity to 2 Timothy 2:12. “If we suffer, we shall also reign with him.”
Getting his start as a cafe attached to the popular, smartly branded G.O.D. nostalgic home furnishings and gifts store, the Xi Yan concept (Chinese for 'banquet') quickly found a large and loyal audience, and expanded to several branches across Hong Kong. Also recognizing the private kitchen trend and chance to experiment with new dishes to a limited set of 'test' diners in a more intimate setting, Jacky opened a private kitchen with just 6-8 tables tucked away in an office building in Wanchai.
But overall, this is a very good All Covers Album.
Brett continues….
HSN’s PR Department answered our question about whether hosts Chris Scanlon and Alicia Perez are gone from the home shopping network.
Have just returned from a short vacation trip on the Orient Express, hence the relatively quiet period on this blog ... not much reasonably priced internet access on there! Back now and raring to put fingers to keyboard.
November: Lewis Carroll
Internet has been extremely unreliable for a few days now. It seems to be straightening out now.
R (a very sweet Romanian girl from Montreal whom I met at a festival in Montreal a year ago) was there. Somehow we didn't get to dance the last few times we ran into each other, so this time I asked her to dance as soon as we met. She improved a lot since the last time we danced, her embrace was very relaxed and warm and when I asked, she told me she worked with Marika on her embrace. It showed. If a follower finds herself in Montreal and wants to work on her embrace (and I can't see why she wouldn't, as it one of the most important elements of close embrace tango), I would highly recommend to seek out Marika. She is a very sweet person and her embrace is amazing. I have yet to meet anyone who danced with her and disagrees with that statement.
Our sources report an Iranian scheme to send the Jewish marchers on a visit to Ain Hilwa to show their solidarity with the most radical Palestinian cause.
When: This Mother Load Mother's Day Giveaway Runs May 3rd - May 13th 11:59 EST so share it and pass the word.
On the commercial front, there are some interesting beers out for Autumn from Sierra Nevada.
Cuts - Magnolia Doohickey leaves, Cheery Lynn small exotic butterflies (cut on pink and swiped with picket fence distress stain to tone them down and give them a white washed look), the shape for the image was created in SCAL2 using a rectangle and ovals
Thousands of furious Afghans besieged a US base for the third day in a row on Thursday, throwing rocks and climbing up the outer walls.
I am a 5’4″, 114lbs, 28 1/2 year old stay at home single mother of a 2 year old toddler who is educated, volunteers & donates to charity, works in entertainment, has started a non profit for education, a registered democrat, a tax payer, God fearing Catholic who lives in a Los Angeles suburb. I also happen to be black.
I'll let you guys know how it goes. Before I do, I wanted to thank my friend Brian for taking a few moments of his awesome beer life to send me some. I encourage you to stop by and read what the man has to say. I'm sure you will enjoy it.
The rash, it's hard to describe, someone online, on message board, where I found most of my information on PUPPPS rash described it as "Dante-esque". It wouldn't calm down with ointment, it mostly was more irritated with lotion or cream or gel, it itched like crazy and the only thing that would stop the itching is to take a shower and cake my whole body in Aveeno oatmeal bath for chicken pox. I couldn't bathe yet since I had just given birth. So I would stand in the steam and cake myself in this powdery goo and get relief. I would take 2 Benadryl at night but then would feel the guilt of potentially passing the Benadryl in my system to the baby while nursing, and yes, I nursed through all of this whole ordeal!!
2nd Place in her race
As they were both successful in their applications, they attended the first workshop, where they learned the basics of marketing, sales cycle and how video can play a role in this for small businesses. They learned how to use GoAnimate, and then had to spend many hours putting their new-found skills to the test by each creating three videos.
We saw the glory with our own eyes,
Because we can't ignore the whole virtual shopping world and it's fun to shop (for real or not) in our pyjamas, this new category of posts will highlight online shopping websites. Don't be shy to share with us your favorite shopping websites!
Hamas leader Khaled Mash’al: “True, our government does not conduct resistance itself, because there is a distribution of roles – the government governs, while the factions carry out the resistance, but our government is like a large tent, which protects the mujahideen and in it they find refuge.”
At Shehzad Tanweer’s memorial funeral in his home village in Pakistan, an estimated 10,000 mourners chanted Jihad, Jihad, Jihad and eulogised the suicide bomber.
“Yeah, what role do you play in all this anyway?”
In all thine anguish lay One truth to heart:
16. Preheat oven to 350 degrees.
to pounce upon
4. Do you love sparkle and glitz? You will look like Beyonce in this bra and panty set by Kiki Montparnasse, which happens to be the glammiest, funniest girl-sex-shop line ever.
One of my favorite go-to recipes to compliment just about anything that comes off the grill is green olive salsa, a recipe I explored last June on this blog. One of the great pleasures of the recipe is its simplicity. The ingredients are combined in a food processor, pulsed a few times, and then served. We had it this weekend, served several ways: as a condiment for the chickpea-quinoa patties, as a salsa on top of crackers and as a tangy topping for the inevetable grilled meats that hit the table.
OK. enough of the random rambling..
Inscribe for the generations to come
But its fruitiness is also its weakness. I have yet to meet a man (or woman) who can drink more than maybe one or two back to back. And this is coming from a man who spent some serious time drinking Boones Strawberry Hill. As much as I love the taste one or two is all I can handle in one sitting.
So drink in forever the Ambrosial Nectar; may you live long, and may the meditative remembrance of the Lord give you infinite delight. (Guru Granth Sahib, Ang 496)
The point is this: remember what actually transpired during the Reagan years, and if you don’t remember, do a little research. This isn’t just about the ideological debate of larger government vs. smaller government, but about economic reality and what is best for the needs of the country. What ailed the country in 1980 was overregulation of business and high federal taxes. That can hardly be argued to be the case now, yet we’re in just as severe of an economic crisis. What Obama proposes is essentially the same formula: deliver a huge injection of money into the economy, which drives up the nation’s debt; make a sweeping investment in parts of the economy seen as necessary for long-term survival, which drives the deficit up further still, all in the expectation that the changes will be cheaper in the long run than doing nothing and will ultimately bring new economic growth.
It is rather telling that so many people get their "news" from the entertainment that they choose. Sadly, you can hardly tell the real "news" from the entertainment anymore...like that Larry O'Donnell piece (and his pathetic apology) from MSNBC. But I do worry a little bit that kids--including my own--don't really see the need and interest to study history, or even current events.
Anyway, I got to thinking what a comic would look like if I drew it. Here are some prototypes. I spent at least four hours on each one.
Non plussed by the negative blowback, Rosen doubled down:
His tiny black terrier sniffed the couple's pug and made nervous but cheerful circles amidst the tiny new group.
Her particular slant on how the nuns in her convent could dress on special occasions (they often wore jewelry, and white dresses with their long hair flowing) caused quite a stir... perhaps that is one of the reasons she attracted a number of wealthy, women to join her convent.
24. The Little Drummer Boy - The Vienna Boys Choir
The necklace that I started with had been sitting on its hook for years untouched. It was in good shape and had nice beads on it so I decided it just needed a redo. This necklace is very easy-even if you've never made jewelry before. All materials can be found relatively cheap at your Hobby Lobby or Michael's store.
How I wish Senator Ferdinand Marcos Jr. would just keep mum on issues about stashed money.
And I am going to pull a two-fer here, because I can't pick one without the other: Ann Kingman and Michael Kindness from Books on the Nightstand. Maybe they would announce their decision as a podcast? At any rate, their damn infectious positivity is a key part of my podcasting routine and I know they are fans of the Tournament of Books.
Fletcher: Oh I’m sorry sir, sorry you go ahead, bargain away sir
The other thing I liked about the movie was the way the director has maintained simplicity throughout the story. The characters, their motives, the plot – everything is kept to the simplest possible. No one dramatizes or overacts. The viewer is just drawn into the simple life of a quaint Dutch village. The simplicity comes out as a breath of fresh air.
Music was very important to your grandfather, he put it on really loudly as soon as he got up every day. It drove your gran mad especially as she hated his taste in music and although they always got on well, that is one thing they used to have frequent rows about.
I guess this isn't really an official beer blog until I rank my top however-many beers. I realize that these are bound to change- and probably drastically- as I consume many more great brews in the near future.
Down to the Rose and Thistle
I didn’t make this, but I just love this elegant side chair my friend Dianna updated recently.
Making it tangable
The innocence murdered that day is being watched by the Almighty and it has implications for many people. It has had implications for me so I do know what I am talking about, and I am looking at the whole situation through the eyes that God has given me.
The tags are cut from Christmas Card cartridge, card #8, 2 1/2" height
We circled Franz Joseph (named after the Austrian Emperor by the German explorer Julius Von Haast in 1865) then flew up to the ice plateau at the top and landed. Aaron jumped out above the clouds and grabbed a handful of snow, formed it into a ball and lobbed it at me. In the background, only a few hundred metres above us was the summit of several mountains, including Mount Cook. The sky was crystal blue, all the clouds lay below us like a huge white carpet, perfectly still. This was the highest Aaron had ever been in his life, with the exception of aircraft. We were standing at a height of approx 2700m on a moving ice field which spanned a 20km area. Life was good.
So one would think that if one had to pay to pee – a ridiculous notion, I know – that one would spend a penny to pee, right?
I approached the day of the workshop with eager anticipation and then upon arrival felt a little fearful – a whole day of drawing. What had I got myself into? I love to draw and make and paint and sew but concentrated effort on drawing from real life with a pencil…
I think you all deserve a prize for making us such happy bunnies this month, but sadly that's just not possible so I will tell you who Mr Random Org., has picked out of the hat.............I am so pleased he does all the hard work because it would have been soooooo difficult to choose, I've not even began to think about how we will whittle down our lists for this month 'In the Spotlight' feature which will be announced on 18th February. So here we go:
Contrast that with Chuck's interactions with the similarly hypersexualized reporter Rebecca Chang:
And not to forget about the awesomeness that is the new coat closet!
So plan ahead. Have a strategy before eating at a restaurant and stick to it. If you plan on ordering a salad, open the menu and only look at the salads.
PrairieFire BioFuels: a member-owned cooperative creating access and building infrastructure to support vegetable oil-based fuels sources and usage.
Tenor players?
Now, for my card shown at the very top of this post: I made a 4 x 4 note card to give with a package or tin of fudge. I like doing these little notecards because you can keep them pretty simple. The word "Christmas" on the front is actually a sticker that I matted. I added some ribbon, twine, and a dimensional sticker. The green polka dot paper is actually much brighter IRL. I wish it photographed better! *sigh* All in all, making this card was pretty easy and quick. One tip I'd like to pass on is that matting really helps to add pizzazz to a card!
It probably won’t be back. NBC could potentially renew any non Chelsea Handler show, but the ratings for this show probably wouldn’t even justify renewal on this network.
1 peerage
Don’t get me wrong, this film was shoddily put together and any director, producer, or editor who was given five minutes could patch this film up so that it limped in to the summer box office with its head held high once more but sadly this isn’t the case.
This was our first ever stay-cation. With any time off we are normally heading north to spend as much time as possible with our fabulous grandparents, brothers and sisters, nieces and nephews. A new year brings in change, right?!
Roshon Fegan and Chelsie Hightower: 23 (7, 8, 8)
The more you clean, the more brilliant
In 1968, Frank Sinatra and his children, included their own version of "The Twelve Days of Christmas" on their album, The Sinatra Family Wish You a Merry Christmas. This version features items that Frank himself would like, such as "Five ivory combs, Four mission lights, Three golf clubs, Two silken scarfs, and a most lovely lavender tie.
Toss together spinach, Apple Sage Sausage, pumpkin seeds, pomegranate, and squash. Plate and drizzle with balsamic reduction.
At some point or another, things will break in your home. You could try to fix them yourself, but many times, it’s best to leave the job to a professional.
Originally from Nebraska, Alexander Payne earned his MFA in Film at UCLA. He made his feature film debut with Citizen Ruth (1996) and followed up with Election (1999), which won Best Screenplay from the Writers’ Guild of America and the New York Film Critics Circle, as well as an Oscar nomination for Best Adapted Screenplay. About Schmidt (2002), premiered in Competition at the Cannes Film Festival. A sensitive director whose inspiration is often drawn from his own filmmaking passions, Payne directed Sideways (2004) as well as his latest film, The Descendants (2011), starring George Clooney, both of which won Oscars for Best Adapted Screenplay.
info@StarAir.us
In baby news...no no no get that out of your heads, we had another addition to our family! Our nephew Patrick "Whit"lock Hamilton, Jr. was born in March and Georgia is loving having a cousin and we are loving watching our family expand...(on someone else's dime!) It's such a joy to watch them interact and so that has subsided our baby fever for a while at least (I think I just heard the grandmother's gasp) but seriously it's been great having more babies join the clan....
1st Prize: Julien Moreau, from the ECV Atlantique school in France.
I must admit that I don’t like fishing very much, but I love my wife and she enjoys it. So I fish occasionally to spend time with her. And sometimes I think about things like this–just for fun.
I know you rider, gonna miss me when I'm goneSome time around 1934, the musicologists and folklorists John and Alan Lomax heard a young African-American woman, in prison for murder, sing a verse from a song they came to call "Woman Blue." The Lomaxes found other verses of "Woman Blue," which may be over a hundred years old, and published the lyrics in their book American Ballads and Folk Songs. The "rider" of the lyrics is either a man or a woman; the term possibly finds its origins in images of mounted prison guards.
116) a fixed lift arrangement to get our boy to black belt training
The community tension and any divisions created were between local busy bodies and anyone who doesn't agree with them.
I have no idea if they'll work in our new home or if there will be a wall big enough for them. *sigh*
Let’s look at the entire text again:
from Chasten R.
The combination of these two things really sent me into over-thinking mode. I weighed every option. If I was convicted in the thought that Kendall would and should only start out with full inclusion, it means she wouldn't be in Public Preschool for Children with Disabilities. (the program she's in now) The district we live in believes (and my personal view is EXACTLY the same)that the pre-school programs are for children with disabilities or children who are economically disadvantaged, or have English as a second language. These are public programs designed to give extra special kids, some extra special help. I'm all for it, and grateful we have such programs. But the view I found myself trying to adopt meant, I'd better walk the walk and talk the talk. SO, where would my daughter be going if she were three and didn't qualify for one of the free pre-school programs? She'd go to the same pre-school program my son went to at the church around the corner. (Then, we'd be able to have our nurse there with her full time, and she'd be learning a typical curriculum with other typically developing kids) It was an exceptional program, and he was more than prepared for Kindergarten....
I left hints, people. The seven heads of the beast were the seven hills of Rome. And there was a whole "cheating death" thing with that wound that healed. Plus the name NERO CAESAR in Hebrew characters has a numerical value of 666. Smart folks have already looked into it. Nero, Nero, Bo-Bero, Banana, Fanna, Fo-Fero... Mee, Mi, Mo-Mero, NERO!
The not so perfect ending is that this was the last time ill see Jo for who knows how long…wow. Atleast friends like this are forever. This trip really is coming to an end. It’s like an award winning movie, a few scenes to go and then the credits with roll. We will be asked to write our Oscar nomination speeches. Thank you Mum and Dad numbers 1,2 and 3. Nannie for the money to help fund this trip. The people I have loved and lost on this trip. Big thanks to the one I lost, without that I wouldn’t have met who I did, did what I did and become brave enough to fly home alone, or have an awards speech that left everyone in awe of my amazing and heartfelt writing. An even bigger thanks to the loved ones. Memories will be forever remembered.
I know what NEEDS to be done ( Honey....ceiling fans..really..it's time dude.) and I know what I want to get done and one can tend to bleed over into the other and then I either :
We are getting ready to head home in a couple of days to visit with our family! We haven't seen them in so long! I am pretty excited to actually be in warm enough weather to swim and tan!
Buy e-book: While I beg you not to pirate a free copy of the book, if you want to buy an e-copy, there are tons of ways to do it now. You can either read it on your e-reader or just download it to the computer and read it that way. Or even to your smart phone. This is probably the wave of the future of books, though I know not everyone likes it right now.
It’s grave to believe tariff needs and requirements of the clients for designing or developing a website or software. If they variety it for personalized use, programmers human to see their individualized preferences and expectations. If they requirement to prefabricated website or software for the organisation, designers or programmers bed to interpret their organizational needs and requirements. And discernment their particular needs and requirements, they bang to fulfill all substantive functions on the place using bespoken programing disregardless of planning languages they deprivation to use. Web developer or specialist unit is not exclusive liable for making clients’ website but the important statement is to make their computer as per their bespoken needs and requirements.
Ice cream and must-see TV "My husband and I have a ritual: Wednesday is TV and ice-cream night. We make an evening run to Dairy Queen, then I kick back to watch The West Wing with my hot fudge M & M-topped sundae."— Andrea M., mother of Joel, 5 months, Martinsburg, W.Va.
Stamps other then mentioned above: Inkadinkadoo clear stamp set Christmas Shapes; Penny Black 'A very very merry Christmas'
All was forgiven. We’d fight again tomorrow, but for now, I moved in for a kiss. She wasn’t really into kissing; light pecks of affection, and maybe a longer passionate kiss here and there were her thing. She refused to use her tongue.
Which criminologists predicted, as MacDonald asserts, that Wall Street bankers, computer programmers, small-business owners, journalists, and other professionals would turn felon 12 months after losing their jobs?
Blush in Fantastico Mauve and Corallina.
The reason for giving up my season ticket was to ensure that I wouldn’t get too hung up about Palace when we made up our minds to move to Australia from England and to give my time to my family.
“I owe him my life,” says Lazarus of Bethany. “Jesus is my homeboy.”
In a position paper that Rabbi Ramon distributed to the Executive Committee, she called attention to the historic centrality of heterosexual marriage in Jewish life.
45 sec. ME Muscle-Ups
The more we expand our spiritual and creative selves
During the Muslim-Socialist protests against Israel’s raids on Gaza of January 2009, protesters throughout Europe and in London openly chanted “Jews to the gas” while the police looked on.
wife mother yogi cook friend lover person
Roasted Sweet Potato and Apple Soup
We also are for the freedom of mind and the freedom of intellectual exchange.
I dreamt this simple recipe up a few months ago and wanted to share it with you in time for Anzac day, as it's a nice alternative to Anzac Biscuits. Although I do love an Anzac Biscuit. Soft and chewy, always. These ones by Katie Quinn Davies particularly took my eye (recipe link).
Broadpeak
“No, not to me. You don’t do this to me. You don’t…” he swept his hands across, then threw it up in frustration. “You don’t play these games.”
Tunner Fire, Pike and San Isabel National Forests, Colorado
The Fabaceae family has many important uses. The seeds contain large amounts of protein and oil, which are healthy for the human body (Figure 2). Some herbs are grown for their grain, while others are grown to be consumed by farm animals. There are also many species in this family that are used for decoration due to their bright colors and unique shapes!
and smiles at my daughter.
따라와 We’re the mastermind (mastermind)
Thank you for all of your continued support!
Josh Hamilton - Catch it! Pretend it's a shot! 0 pts. What??? Too soon?
Tonight, it's quite evident, but the planets aren't above the horizon (enough) even now to get a decent shot.
Very few meteors actually reach the ground as 99.99% completely disintegrate while still 10-20 miles up in the atmosphere.
Scarf, bangle: from a local import store
I’m not participating in the 365 Project anymore – it’s become inhabited by kids and other oddities! But I do check in on a new “contest” on the site – WWYD – What Would You Do. A photo is offered on this page for other participants to play with, add color, remove color, change, distort – just have a good time. Here’s the one they are currently working on…
My mom and dad are now living with us (something Harry and I have been trying to get them to do for 8 years). We've turned our living room into their room and we're trying to make them as comfortable as possible.
